By the (Winds) that scatter broadcast;
And those that lift and bear away heavy weights;
And those that flow with ease and gentleness;
And those that distribute and apportion by Command;-
Verily that which ye are promised is true;
And verily Judgment and Justice must indeed come to pass.
By the Sky with (its) numerous Paths,
Truly ye are in a doctrine discordant,
Through which are deluded (away from the Truth) such as would be deluded.
Woe to the falsehood-mongers,-
Those who (flounder) heedless in a flood of confusion:
They ask, "When will be the Day of Judgment and Justice?"
(It will be) a Day when they will be tried (and tested) over the Fire!
"Taste ye your trial! This is what ye used to ask to be hastened!"
As to the Righteous, they will be in the midst of Gardens and Springs,
Taking joy in the things which their Lord gives them, because, before then, they lived a good life.
They were in the habit of sleeping but little by night,
And in the hour of early dawn, they (were found) praying for Forgiveness;
And in their wealth and possessions (was remembered) the right of the (needy,) him who asked, and him who (for some reason) was prevented (from asking).
On the earth are signs for those of assured Faith,
As also in your own selves: Will ye not then see?
And in heaven is your Sustenance, as (also) that which ye are promised.
Then, by the Lord of heaven and earth, this is the very Truth, as much as the fact that ye can speak intelligently to each other.
Has the story reached thee, of the honoured guests of Abraham?
Behold, they entered his presence, and said: "Peace!" He said, "Peace!" (and thought, "These seem) unusual people."
Then he turned quickly to his household, brought out a fatted calf,
And placed it before them.. he said, "Will ye not eat?"
(When they did not eat), He conceived a fear of them. They said, "Fear not," and they gave him glad tidings of a son endowed with knowledge.
But his wife came forward (laughing) aloud: she smote her forehead and said: "A barren old woman!"
They said, "Even so has thy Lord spoken: and He is full of Wisdom and Knowledge."
(Abraham) said: "And what, O ye Messengers, is your errand (now)?"
They said, "We have been sent to a people (deep) in sin;-
"To bring on, on them, (a shower of) stones of clay (brimstone),
"Marked as from thy Lord for those who trespass beyond bounds."
Then We evacuated those of the Believers who were there,
But We found not there any just (Muslim) persons except in one house:
And We left there a Sign for such as fear the Grievous Penalty.
And in Moses (was another Sign): Behold, We sent him to Pharaoh, with authority manifest.
But (Pharaoh) turned back with his Chiefs, and said, "A sorcerer, or one possessed!"
So We took him and his forces, and threw them into the sea; and his was the blame.
And in the 'Ad (people) (was another Sign): Behold, We sent against them the devastating Wind:
It left nothing whatever that it came up against, but reduced it to ruin and rottenness.
And in the Thamud (was another Sign): Behold, they were told, "Enjoy (your brief day) for a little while!"
But they insolently defied the Command of their Lord: So the stunning noise (of an earthquake) seized them, even while they were looking on.
Then they could not even stand (on their feet), nor could they help themselves.
So were the People of Noah before them for they wickedly transgressed.
With power and skill did We construct the Firmament: for it is We Who create the vastness of pace.
And We have spread out the (spacious) earth: How excellently We do spread out!
And of every thing We have created pairs: That ye may receive instruction.
Hasten ye then (at once) to God: I am from Him a Warner to you, clear and open!
And make not another an object of worship with God: I am from Him a Warner to you, clear and open!
Similarly, no apostle came to the Peoples before them, but they said (of him) in like manner, "A sorcerer, or one possessed"!
Is this the legacy they have transmitted, one to another? Nay, they are themselves a people transgressing beyond bounds!
So turn away from them: not thine is the blame.
But teach (thy Message) for teaching benefits the Believers.
I have only created Jinns and men, that they may serve Me.
No Sustenance do I require of them, nor do I require that they should feed Me.
For God is He Who gives (all) Sustenance,- Lord of Power,- Steadfast (for ever).
For the Wrong-doers, their portion is like unto the portion of their fellows (of earlier generations): then let them not ask Me to hasten (that portion)!
Woe, then, to the Unbelievers, on account of that Day of theirs which they have been promised!
By the Mount (of Revelation);
By a Decree inscribed
In a Scroll unfolded;
By the much-frequented Fane;
By the Canopy Raised High;
And by the Ocean filled with Swell;-
Verily, the Doom of thy Lord will indeed come to pass;-
There is none can avert it;-
On the Day when the firmament will be in dreadful commotion.
And the mountains will fly hither and thither.
Then woe that Day to those that treat (Truth) as Falsehood;-
That play (and paddle) in shallow trifles.
That Day shall they be thrust down to the Fire of Hell, irresistibly.
"This:, it will be said, "Is the Fire,- which ye were wont to deny!
"Is this then a fake, or is it ye that do not see?
"Burn ye therein: the same is it to you whether ye bear it with patience, or not: Ye but receive the recompense of your (own) deeds."
As to the Righteous, they will be in Gardens, and in Happiness,-
Enjoying the (Bliss) which their Lord hath bestowed on them, and their Lord shall deliver them from the Penalty of the Fire.
(To them will be said:) "Eat and drink ye, with profit and health, because of your (good) deeds."
They will recline (with ease) on Thrones (of dignity) arranged in ranks; and We shall join them to Companions, with beautiful big and lustrous eyes.
And those who believe and whose families follow them in Faith,- to them shall We join their families: Nor shall We deprive them (of the fruit) of aught of their works: (Yet) is each individual in pledge for his deeds.
And We shall bestow on them, of fruit and meat, anything they shall desire.
They shall there exchange, one with another, a (loving) cup free of frivolity, free of all taint of ill.
Round about them will serve, (devoted) to them. Youths (handsome) as Pearls well-guarded.
They will advance to each other, engaging in mutual enquiry.
They will say: "Aforetime, we were not without fear for the sake of our people.
"But God has been good to us, and has delivered us from the Penalty of the Scorching Wind.
"Truly, we did call unto Him from of old: truly it is He, the Beneficent, the Merciful!"
Therefore proclaim thou the praises (of thy Lord): for by the Grace of thy Lord, thou art no (vulgar) soothsayer, nor art thou one possessed.
Or do they say:- "A Poet! we await for him some calamity (hatched) by Time!"
Say thou: "Await ye!- I too will wait along with you!"
Is it that their faculties of understanding urge them to this, or are they but a people transgressing beyond bounds?
Or do they say, "He fabricated the (Message)"? Nay, they have no faith!
Let them then produce a recital like unto it,- If (it be) they speak the truth!
Were they created of nothing, or were they themselves the creators?
Or did they create the heavens and the earth? Nay, they have no firm belief.
Or are the Treasures of thy Lord with them, or are they the managers (of affairs)?
Or have they a ladder, by which they can (climb up to heaven and) listen (to its secrets)? Then let (such a) listener of theirs produce a manifest proof.
Or has He only daughters and ye have sons?
Or is it that thou dost ask for a reward, so that they are burdened with a load of debt?-
Or that the Unseen in it their hands, and they write it down?
Or do they intend a plot (against thee)? But those who defy God are themselves involved in a Plot!
Or have they a god other than God? Exalted is God far above the things they associate with Him!
Were they to see a piece of the sky falling (on them), they would (only) say: "Clouds gathered in heaps!"
So leave them alone until they encounter that Day of theirs, wherein they shall (perforce) swoon (with terror),-
The Day when their plotting will avail them nothing and no help shall be given them.
And verily, for those who do wrong, there is another punishment besides this: But most of them understand not.
Now await in patience the command of thy Lord: for verily thou art in Our eyes: and celebrate the praises of thy Lord the while thou standest forth,
And for part of the night also praise thou Him,- and at the retreat of the stars!
By the Star when it goes down,-
Your Companion is neither astray nor being misled.
Nor does he say (aught) of (his own) Desire.
It is no less than inspiration sent down to him:
He was taught by one Mighty in Power,
Endued with Wisdom: for he appeared (in stately form);
While he was in the highest part of the horizon:
Then he approached and came closer,
And was at a distance of but two bow-lengths or (even) nearer;
So did (God) convey the inspiration to His Servant- (conveyed) what He (meant) to convey.
The (Prophet's) (mind and) heart in no way falsified that which he saw.
Will ye then dispute with him concerning what he saw?
For indeed he saw him at a second descent,
Near the Lote-tree beyond which none may pass:
Near it is the Garden of Abode.
Behold, the Lote-tree was shrouded (in mystery unspeakable!)
(His) sight never swerved, nor did it go wrong!
For truly did he see, of the Signs of his Lord, the Greatest!
Have ye seen Lat. and 'Uzza,
And another, the third (goddess), Manat?
What! for you the male sex, and for Him, the female?
Behold, such would be indeed a division most unfair!
These are nothing but names which ye have devised,- ye and your fathers,- for which God has sent down no authority (whatever). They follow nothing but conjecture and what their own souls desire!- Even though there has already come to them Guidance from their Lord!
Nay, shall man have (just) anything he hankers after?
But it is to God that the End and the Beginning (of all things) belong.
How many-so-ever be the angels in the heavens, their intercession will avail nothing except after God has given leave for whom He pleases and that he is acceptable to Him.
Those who believe not in the Hereafter, name the angels with female names.
But they have no knowledge therein. They follow nothing but conjecture; and conjecture avails nothing against Truth.
Therefore shun those who turn away from Our Message and desire nothing but the life of this world.
That is as far as knowledge will reach them. Verily thy Lord knoweth best those who stray from His Path, and He knoweth best those who receive guidance.
Yea, to God belongs all that is in the heavens and on earth: so that He rewards those who do evil, according to their deeds, and He rewards those who do good, with what is best.
Those who avoid great sins and shameful deeds, only (falling into) small faults,- verily thy Lord is ample in forgiveness. He knows you well when He brings you out of the earth, And when ye are hidden in your mothers' wombs. Therefore justify not yourselves: He knows best who it is that guards against evil.
Seest thou one who turns back,
Gives a little, then hardens (his heart)?
What! Has he knowledge of the Unseen so that he can see?
Nay, is he not acquainted with what is in the Books of Moses-
And of Abraham who fulfilled his engagements?-
Namely, that no bearer of burdens can bear the burden of another;
That man can have nothing but what he strives for;
That (the fruit of) his striving will soon come in sight:
Then will he be rewarded with a reward complete;
That to thy Lord is the final Goal;
That it is He Who granteth Laughter and Tears;
That it is He Who granteth Death and Life;
That He did create in pairs,- male and female,
From a seed when lodged (in its place);
That He hath promised a Second Creation (Raising of the Dead);
That it is He Who giveth wealth and satisfaction;
That He is the Lord of Sirius (the Mighty Star);
And that it is He Who destroyed the (powerful) ancient 'Ad (people),
And the Thamud nor gave them a lease of perpetual life.
And before them, the people of Noah, for that they were (all) most unjust and most insolent transgressors,
And He destroyed the Overthrown Cities (of Sodom and Gomorrah).
So that (ruins unknown) have covered them up.
Then which of the gifts of thy Lord, (O man,) wilt thou dispute about?
This is a Warner, of the (series of) Warners of old!
The (Judgment) ever approaching draws nigh:
No (soul) but God can lay it bare.
Do ye then wonder at this recital?
And will ye laugh and not weep,-
Wasting your time in vanities?
But fall ye down in prostration to God, and adore (Him)!
The Hour (of Judgment) is nigh, and the moon is cleft asunder.
But if they see a Sign, they turn away, and say, "This is (but) transient magic."
They reject (the warning) and follow their (own) lusts but every matter has its appointed time.
There have already come to them Recitals wherein there is (enough) to check (them),
Mature wisdom;- but (the preaching of) Warners profits them not.
Therefore, (O Prophet,) turn away from them. The Day that the Caller will call (them) to a terrible affair,
They will come forth,- their eyes humbled - from (their) graves, (torpid) like locusts scattered abroad,
Hastening, with eyes transfixed, towards the Caller!- "Hard is this Day!", the Unbelievers will say.
Before them the People of Noah rejected (their apostle): they rejected Our servant, and said, "Here is one possessed!", and he was driven out.
Then he called on his Lord: "I am one overcome: do Thou then help (me)!"
So We opened the gates of heaven, with water pouring forth.
And We caused the earth to gush forth with springs, so the waters met (and rose) to the extent decreed.
But We bore him on an (Ark) made of broad planks and caulked with palm- fibre:
She floats under our eyes (and care): a recompense to one who had been rejected (with scorn)!
And We have left this as a Sign (for all time): then is there any that will receive admonition?
But how (terrible) was My Penalty and My Warning?
And We have indeed made the Qur'an easy to understand and remember: then is there any that will receive admonition?
The 'Ad (people) (too) rejected (Truth): then how terrible was My Penalty and My Warning?
For We sent against them a furious wind, on a Day of violent Disaster,
Plucking out men as if they were roots of palm-trees torn up (from the ground).
Yea, how (terrible) was My Penalty and My Warning!
But We have indeed made the Qur'an easy to understand and remember: then is there any that will receive admonition?
The Thamud (also) rejected (their) Warners.
For they said: "What! a man! a Solitary one from among ourselves! shall we follow such a one? Truly should we then be straying in mind, and mad!
"Is it that the Message is sent to him, of all people amongst us? Nay, he is a liar, an insolent one!"
Ah! they will know on the morrow, which is the liar, the insolent one!
For We will send the she-camel by way of trial for them. So watch them, (O Salih), and possess thyself in patience!
And tell them that the water is to be divided between them: Each one's right to drink being brought forward (by suitable turns).
But they called to their companion, and he took a sword in hand, and hamstrung (her).
Ah! how (terrible) was My Penalty and My Warning!
For We sent against them a single Mighty Blast, and they became like the dry stubble used by one who pens cattle.
And We have indeed made the Qur'an easy to understand and remember: then is there any that will receive admonition?
The people of Lut rejected (his) warning.
We sent against them a violent Tornado with showers of stones, (which destroyed them), except Lut's household: them We delivered by early Dawn,-
As a Grace from Us: thus do We reward those who give thanks.
And (Lut) did warn them of Our Punishment, but they disputed about the Warning.
And they even sought to snatch away his guests from him, but We blinded their eyes. (They heard:) "Now taste ye My Wrath and My Warning."
Early on the morrow an abiding Punishment seized them:
"So taste ye My Wrath and My Warning."
And We have indeed made the Qur'an easy to understand and remember: then is there any that will receive admonition?
To the People of Pharaoh, too, aforetime, came Warners (from God).
The (people) rejected all Our Signs; but We seized them with such Penalty (as comes) from One Exalted in Power, able to carry out His Will.
Are your Unbelievers, (O Quraish), better than they? Or have ye an immunity in the Sacred Books?
Or do they say: "We acting together can defend ourselves"?
Soon will their multitude be put to flight, and they will show their backs.
Nay, the Hour (of Judgment) is the time promised them (for their full recompense): And that Hour will be most grievous and most bitter.
Truly those in sin are the ones straying in mind, and mad.
The Day they will be dragged through the Fire on their faces, (they will hear:) "Taste ye the touch of Hell!"
Verily, all things have We created in proportion and measure.
And Our Command is but a single (Act),- like the twinkling of an eye.
And (oft) in the past, have We destroyed gangs like unto you: then is there any that will receive admonition?
All that they do is noted in (their) Books (of Deeds):
Every matter, small and great, is on record.
As to the Righteous, they will be in the midst of Gardens and Rivers,
In an Assembly of Truth, in the Presence of a Sovereign Omnipotent.
(God) Most Gracious!
It is He Who has taught the Qur'an.
He has created man:
He has taught him speech (and intelligence).
The sun and the moon follow courses (exactly) computed;
And the herbs and the trees - both (alike) bow in adoration.
And the Firmament has He raised high, and He has set up the Balance (of Justice),
In order that ye may not transgress (due) balance.
So establish weight with justice and fall not short in the balance.
It is He Who has spread out the earth for (His) creatures:
Therein is fruit and date-palms, producing spathes (enclosing dates);
Also corn, with (its) leaves and stalk for fodder, and sweet-smelling plants.
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
He created man from sounding clay like unto pottery,
And He created Jinns from fire free of smoke:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
(He is) Lord of the two Easts and Lord of the two Wests:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
He has let free the two bodies of flowing water, meeting together:
Between them is a Barrier which they do not transgress:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
Out of them come Pearls and Coral:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
And His are the Ships sailing smoothly through the seas, lofty as mountains:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
All that is on earth will perish:
But will abide (for ever) the Face of thy Lord,- full of Majesty, Bounty and Honour.
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
Of Him seeks (its need) every creature in the heavens and on earth: every day in (new) Splendour doth He (shine)!
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
Soon shall We settle your affairs, O both ye worlds!
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
O ye assembly of Jinns and men! If it be ye can pass beyond the zones of the heavens and the earth, pass ye! not without authority shall ye be able to pass!
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
On you will be sent (O ye evil ones twain!) a flame of fire (to burn) and a smoke (to choke): no defence will ye have:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
When the sky is rent asunder, and it becomes red like ointment:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
On that Day no question will be asked of man or Jinn as to his sin.
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
(For) the sinners will be known by their marks: and they will be seized by their forelocks and their feet.
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
This is the Hell which the Sinners deny:
In its midst and in the midst of boiling hot water will they wander round!
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
But for such as fear the time when they will stand before (the Judgment Seat of) their Lord, there will be two Gardens-
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?-
Containing all kinds (of trees and delights);-
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?-
In them (each) will be two Springs flowing (free);
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?-
In them will be Fruits of every kind, two and two.
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
They will recline on Carpets, whose inner linings will be of rich brocade: the Fruit of the Gardens will be near (and easy of reach).
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
In them will be (Maidens), chaste, restraining their glances, whom no man or Jinn before them has touched;-
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?-
Like unto Rubies and coral.
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
Is there any Reward for Good - other than Good?
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
And besides these two, there are two other Gardens,-
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?-
Dark-green in colour (from plentiful watering).
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
In them (each) will be two Springs pouring forth water in continuous abundance:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
In them will be Fruits, and dates and pomegranates:
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
In them will be fair (Companions), good, beautiful;-
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?-
Companions restrained (as to their glances), in (goodly) pavilions;-
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?-
Whom no man or Jinn before them has touched;-
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?-
Reclining on green Cushions and rich Carpets of beauty.
Then which of the favours of your Lord will ye deny?
Blessed be the name of thy Lord, full of Majesty, Bounty and Honour.
When the Event inevitable cometh to pass,
Then will no (soul) entertain falsehood concerning its coming.
(Many) will it bring low; (many) will it exalt;
When the earth shall be shaken to its depths,
And the mountains shall be crumbled to atoms,
Becoming dust scattered abroad,
And ye shall be sorted out into three classes.
Then (there will be) the Companions of the Right Hand;- What will be the Companions of the Right Hand?
And the Companions of the Left Hand,- what will be the Companions of the Left Hand?
And those Foremost (in Faith) will be Foremost (in the Hereafter).
These will be those Nearest to God:
In Gardens of Bliss:
A number of people from those of old,
And a few from those of later times.
(They will be) on Thrones encrusted (with gold and precious stones),
Reclining on them, facing each other.
Round about them will (serve) youths of perpetual (freshness),
With goblets, (shining) beakers, and cups (filled) out of clear-flowing fountains:
No after-ache will they receive therefrom, nor will they suffer intoxication:
And with fruits, any that they may select:
And the flesh of fowls, any that they may desire.
And (there will be) Companions with beautiful, big, and lustrous eyes,-
Like unto Pearls well-guarded.
A Reward for the deeds of their past (life).
Not frivolity will they hear therein, nor any taint of ill,-
Only the saying, "Peace! Peace".
The Companions of the Right Hand,- what will be the Companions of the Right Hand?
(They will be) among Lote-trees without thorns,
Among Talh trees with flowers (or fruits) piled one above another,-
In shade long-extended,
By water flowing constantly,
And fruit in abundance.
Whose season is not limited, nor (supply) forbidden,
And on Thrones (of Dignity), raised high.
We have created (their Companions) of special creation.
And made them virgin - pure (and undefiled), -
Beloved (by nature), equal in age,-
For the Companions of the Right Hand.
A (goodly) number from those of old,
And a (goodly) number from those of later times.
The Companions of the Left Hand,- what will be the Companions of the Left Hand?
(They will be) in the midst of a Fierce Blast of Fire and in Boiling Water,
And in the shades of Black Smoke:
Nothing (will there be) to refresh, nor to please:
For that they were wont to be indulged, before that, in wealth (and luxury),
And persisted obstinately in wickedness supreme!
And they used to say, "What! when we die and become dust and bones, shall we then indeed be raised up again?-
"(We) and our fathers of old?"
Say: "Yea, those of old and those of later times,
"All will certainly be gathered together for the meeting appointed for a Day well-known.
"Then will ye truly,- O ye that go wrong, and treat (Truth) as Falsehood!-
"Ye will surely taste of the Tree of Zaqqum.
"Then will ye fill your insides therewith,
"And drink Boiling Water on top of it:
"Indeed ye shall drink like diseased camels raging with thirst!"
Such will be their entertainment on the Day of Requital!
It is We Who have created you: why will ye not witness the Truth?
Do ye then see?- The (human Seed) that ye throw out,-
Is it ye who create it, or are We the Creators?
We have decreed Death to be your common lot, and We are not to be frustrated
from changing your Forms and creating you (again) in (forms) that ye know not.
And ye certainly know already the first form of creation: why then do ye not celebrate His praises?
See ye the seed that ye sow in the ground?
Is it ye that cause it to grow, or are We the Cause?
Were it Our Will, We could crumble it to dry powder, and ye would be left in wonderment,
(Saying), "We are indeed left with debts (for nothing):
"Indeed are we shut out (of the fruits of our labour)"
See ye the water which ye drink?
Do ye bring it down (in rain) from the cloud or do We?
Were it Our Will, We could make it salt (and unpalatable): then why do ye not give thanks?
See ye the Fire which ye kindle?
Is it ye who grow the tree which feeds the fire, or do We grow it?
We have made it a memorial (of Our handiwork), and an article of comfort and convenience for the denizens of deserts.
Then celebrate with praises the name of thy Lord, the Supreme!
Furthermore I call to witness the setting of the Stars,-
And that is indeed a mighty adjuration if ye but knew,-
That this is indeed a qur'an Most Honourable,
In Book well-guarded,
Which none shall touch but those who are clean:
A Revelation from the Lord of the Worlds.
Is it such a Message that ye would hold in light esteem?
And have ye made it your livelihood that ye should declare it false?
Then why do ye not (intervene) when (the soul of the dying man) reaches the throat,-
And ye the while (sit) looking on,-
But We are nearer to him than ye, and yet see not,-
Then why do ye not,- If you are exempt from (future) account,-
Call back the soul, if ye are true (in the claim of independence)?
Thus, then, if he be of those Nearest to God,
(There is for him) Rest and Satisfaction, and a Garden of Delights.
And if he be of the Companions of the Right Hand,
(For him is the salutation), "Peace be unto thee", from the Companions of the Right Hand.
And if he be of those who treat (Truth) as Falsehood, who go wrong,
For him is Entertainment with Boiling Water.
And burning in Hell-Fire.
Verily, this is the Very Truth and Certainly.
So celebrate with praises the name of thy Lord, the Supreme.
Whatever is in the heavens and on earth,- let it declare the Praises and Glory of God: for He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
To Him belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth: It is He Who gives Life and Death; and He has Power over all things.
He is the First and the Last, the Evident and the Immanent: and He has full knowledge of all things.
He it is Who created the heavens and the earth in Six Days, and is moreover firmly established on the Throne (of Authority). He knows what enters within the earth and what comes forth out of it, what comes down from heaven and what mounts up to it. And He is with you wheresoever ye may be. And God sees well all that ye do.
To Him belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth: and all affairs are referred back to God.
He merges Night into Day, and He merges Day into Night; and He has full knowledge of the secrets of (all) hearts.
Believe in God and His apostle, and spend (in charity) out of the (substance) whereof He has made you heirs. For, those of you who believe and spend (in charity),- for them is a great Reward.
What cause have ye why ye should not believe in God?- and the Apostle invites you to believe in your Lord, and has indeed taken your Covenant, if ye are men of Faith.
He is the One Who sends to His Servant Manifest Signs, that He may lead you from the depths of Darkness into the Light and verily God is to you most kind and Merciful.
And what cause have ye why ye should not spend in the cause of God?- For to God belongs the heritage of the heavens and the earth. Not equal among you are those who spent (freely) and fought, before the Victory, (with those who did so later). Those are higher in rank than those who spent (freely) and fought afterwards. But to all has God promised a goodly (reward). And God is well acquainted with all that ye do.
Who is he that will Loan to God a beautiful loan? for (God) will increase it manifold to his credit, and he will have (besides) a liberal Reward.
One Day shalt thou see the believing men and the believing women- how their Light runs forward before them and by their right hands: (their greeting will be): "Good News for you this Day! Gardens beneath which flow rivers! to dwell therein for aye! This is indeed the highest Achievement!"
One Day will the Hypocrites- men and women - say to the Believers: "Wait for us! Let us borrow (a Light) from your Light!" It will be said: "Turn ye back to your rear! then seek a Light (where ye can)!" So a wall will be put up betwixt them, with a gate therein. Within it will be Mercy throughout, and without it, all alongside, will be (Wrath and) Punishment!
(Those without) will call out, "Were we not with you?" (The others) will reply, "True! but ye led yourselves into temptation; ye looked forward (to our ruin); ye doubted (God's Promise); and (your false) desires deceived you; until there issued the Command of God. And the Deceiver deceived you in respect of God.
"This Day shall no ransom be accepted of you, nor of those who rejected God." Your abode is the Fire: that is the proper place to claim you: and an evil refuge it is!"
Has not the Time arrived for the Believers that their hearts in all humility should engage in the remembrance of God and of the Truth which has been revealed (to them), and that they should not become like those to whom was given Revelation aforetime, but long ages passed over them and their hearts grew hard? For many among them are rebellious transgressors.
Know ye (all) that God giveth life to the earth after its death! already have We shown the Signs plainly to you, that ye may learn wisdom.
For those who give in Charity, men and women, and loan to God a Beautiful Loan, it shall be increased manifold (to their credit), and they shall have (besides) a liberal reward.
And those who believe in God and His apostles- they are the Sincere (lovers of Truth), and the witnesses (who testify), in the eyes of their Lord: They shall have their Reward and their Light. But those who reject God and deny Our Signs,- they are the Companions of Hell-Fire.
Know ye (all), that the life of this world is but play and amusement, pomp and mutual boasting and multiplying, (in rivalry) among yourselves, riches and children. Here is a similitude: How rain and the growth which it brings forth, delight (the hearts of) the tillers; soon it withers; thou wilt see it grow yellow; then it becomes dry and crumbles away. But in the Hereafter is a Penalty severe (for the devotees of wrong). And Forgiveness from God and (His) Good Pleasure (for the devotees of God). And what is the life of this world, but goods and chattels of deception?
Be ye foremost (in seeking) Forgiveness from your Lord, and a Garden (of Bliss), the width whereof is as the width of heaven and earth, prepared for those who believe in God and His apostles: that is the Grace of God, which He bestows on whom he pleases: and God is the Lord of Grace abounding.
No misfortune can happen on earth or in your souls but is recorded in a decree before We bring it into existence: That is truly easy for God:
In order that ye may not despair over matters that pass you by, nor exult over favours bestowed upon you. For God loveth not any vainglorious boaster,-
Such persons as are covetous and commend covetousness to men. And if any turn back (from God's Way), verily God is Free of all Needs, Worthy of all Praise.
We sent aforetime our apostles with Clear Signs and sent down with them the Book and the Balance (of Right and Wrong), that men may stand forth in justice; and We sent down Iron, in which is (material for) mighty war, as well as many benefits for mankind, that God may test who it is that will help, Unseen, Him and His apostles: For God is Full of Strength, Exalted in Might (and able to enforce His Will).
And We sent Noah and Abraham, and established in their line Prophethood and Revelation: and some of them were on right guidance. But many of them became rebellious transgressors.
Then, in their wake, We followed them up with (others of) Our apostles: We sent after them Jesus the son of Mary, and bestowed on him the Gospel; and We ordained in the hearts of those who followed him Compassion and Mercy. But the Monasticism which they invented for themselves, We did not prescribe for them: (We commanded) only the seeking for the Good Pleasure of God; but that they did not foster as they should have done. Yet We bestowed, on those among them who believed, their (due) reward, but many of them are rebellious transgressors.
O ye that believe! Fear God, and believe in His Apostle, and He will bestow on you a double portion of His Mercy: He will provide for you a Light by which ye shall walk (straight in your path), and He will forgive you (your past): for God is Oft- Forgiving, Most Merciful.
That the People of the Book may know that they have no power whatever over the Grace of God, that (His) Grace is (entirely) in His Hand, to bestow it on whomsoever He wills. For God is the Lord of Grace abounding.
God has indeed heard (and accepted) the statement of the woman who pleads with thee concerning her husband and carries her complaint (in prayer) to God: and God (always) hears the arguments between both sides among you: for God hears and sees (all things).
If any men among you divorce their wives by Zihar (calling them mothers), they cannot be their mothers: None can be their mothers except those who gave them birth. And in fact they use words (both) iniquitous and false: but truly God is one that blots out (sins), and forgives (again and again).
But those who divorce their wives by Zihar, then wish to go back on the words they uttered,- (It is ordained that such a one) should free a slave before they touch each other: Thus are ye admonished to perform: and God is well-acquainted with (all) that ye do.
And if any has not (the wherewithal), he should fast for two months consecutively before they touch each other. But if any is unable to do so, he should feed sixty indigent ones, this, that ye may show your faith in God and His Apostle. Those are limits (set by) God. For those who reject (Him), there is a grievous Penalty.
Those who resist God and His Apostle will be humbled to dust, as were those before them: for We have already sent down Clear Signs. And the Unbelievers (will have) a humiliating Penalty,-
On the Day that God will raise them all up (again) and show them the Truth (and meaning) of their conduct. God has reckoned its (value), though they may have forgotten it, for God is Witness to all things.
Seest thou not that God doth know (all) that is in the heavens and on earth? There is not a secret consultation between three, but He makes the fourth among them, - Nor between five but He makes the sixth,- nor between fewer nor more, but He is in their midst, wheresoever they be: In the end will He tell them the truth of their conduct, on the Day of Judgment. For God has full knowledge of all things.
Turnest thou not thy sight towards those who were forbidden secret counsels yet revert to that which they were forbidden (to do)? And they hold secret counsels among themselves for iniquity and hostility, and disobedience to the Apostle. And when they come to thee, they salute thee, not as God salutes thee, (but in crooked ways): And they say to themselves, "Why does not God punish us for our words?" Enough for them is Hell: In it will they burn, and evil is that destination!
O ye who believe! When ye hold secret counsel, do it not for iniquity and hostility, and disobedience to the Prophet; but do it for righteousness and self- restraint; and fear God, to Whom ye shall be brought back.
Secret counsels are only (inspired) by the Evil One, in order that he may cause grief to the Believers; but he cannot harm them in the least, except as God permits; and on God let the Believers put their trust.
O ye who believe! When ye are told to make room in the assemblies, (spread out and) make room: (ample) room will God provide for you. And when ye are told to rise up, rise up God will rise up, to (suitable) ranks (and degrees), those of you who believe and who have been granted (mystic) Knowledge. And God is well- acquainted with all ye do.
O ye who believe! When ye consult the Apostle in private, spend something in charity before your private consultation. That will be best for you, and most conducive to purity (of conduct). But if ye find not (the wherewithal), God is Oft- Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Is it that ye are afraid of spending sums in charity before your private consultation (with him)? If, then, ye do not so, and God forgives you, then (at least) establish regular prayer; practise regular charity; and obey God and His Apostle. And God is well-acquainted with all that ye do.
Turnest thou not thy attention to those who turn (in friendship) to such as have the Wrath of God upon them? They are neither of you nor of them, and they swear to falsehood knowingly.
God has prepared for them a severe Penalty: evil indeed are their deeds.
They have made their oaths a screen (for their misdeeds): thus they obstruct (men) from the Path of God: therefore shall they have a humiliating Penalty.
Of no profit whatever to them, against God, will be their riches nor their sons: they will be Companions of the Fire, to dwell therein (for aye)!
One day will God raise them all up (for Judgment): then will they swear to Him as they swear to you: And they think that they have something (to stand upon). No, indeed! they are but liars!
The Evil One has got the better of them: so he has made them lose the remembrance of God. They are the Party of the Evil One. Truly, it is the Party of the Evil One that will perish!
Those who resist God and His Apostle will be among those most humiliated.
God has decreed: "It is I and My apostles who must prevail": For God is One full of strength, able to enforce His Will.
Thou wilt not find any people who believe in God and the Last Day, loving those who resist God and His Apostle, even though they were their fathers or their sons, or their brothers, or their kindred. For such He has written Faith in their hearts, and strengthened them with a spirit from Himself. And He will admit them to Gardens beneath which Rivers flow, to dwell therein (for ever). God will be well pleased with them, and they with Him. They are the Party of God. Truly it is the Party of God that will achieve Felicity.
Whatever is in the heavens and on earth, let it declare the Praises and Glory of God: for He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
It is He Who got out the Unbelievers among the People of the Book from their homes at the first gathering (of the forces). Little did ye think that they would get out: And they thought that their fortresses would defend them from God! But the (Wrath of) God came to them from quarters from which they little expected (it), and cast terror into their hearts, so that they destroyed their dwellings by their own hands and the hands of the Believers, take warning, then, O ye with eyes (to see)!
And had it not been that God had decreed banishment for them, He would certainly have punished them in this world: And in the Hereafter they shall (certainly) have the Punishment of the Fire.
That is because they resisted God and His Apostle: and if any one resists God, verily God is severe in Punishment.
Whether ye cut down (O ye Muslim!) The tender palm-trees, or ye left them standing on their roots, it was by leave of God, and in order that He might cover with shame the rebellious transgresses.
What God has bestowed on His Apostle (and taken away) from them - for this ye made no expedition with either cavalry or camelry: but God gives power to His apostles over any He pleases: and God has power over all things.
What God has bestowed on His Apostle (and taken away) from the people of the townships,- belongs to God,- to His Apostle and to kindred and orphans, the needy and the wayfarer; In order that it may not (merely) make a circuit between the wealthy among you. So take what the Apostle assigns to you, and deny yourselves that which he withholds from you. And fear God; for God is strict in Punishment.
(Some part is due) to the indigent Muhajirs, those who were expelled from their homes and their property, while seeking Grace from God and (His) Good Pleasure, and aiding God and His Apostle: such are indeed the sincere ones:-
But those who before them, had homes (in Medina) and had adopted the Faith,- show their affection to such as came to them for refuge, and entertain no desire in their hearts for things given to the (latter), but give them preference over themselves, even though poverty was their (own lot). And those saved from the covetousness of their own souls,- they are the ones that achieve prosperity.
And those who came after them say: "Our Lord! Forgive us, and our brethren who came before us into the Faith, and leave not, in our hearts, rancour (or sense of injury) against those who have believed. Our Lord! Thou art indeed Full of Kindness, Most Merciful."
Hast thou not observed the Hypocrites say to their misbelieving brethren among the People of the Book? - "If ye are expelled, we too will go out with you, and we will never hearken to any one in your affair; and if ye are attacked (in fight) we will help you". But God is witness that they are indeed liars.
If they are expelled, never will they go out with them; and if they are attacked (in fight), they will never help them; and if they do help them, they will turn their backs; so they will receive no help.
Of a truth ye are stronger (than they) because of the terror in their hearts, (sent) by God. This is because they are men devoid of understanding.
They will not fight you (even) together, except in fortified townships, or from behind walls. Strong is their fighting (spirit) amongst themselves: thou wouldst think they were united, but their hearts are divided: that is because they are a people devoid of wisdom.
Like those who lately preceded them, they have tasted the evil result of their conduct; and (in the Hereafter there is) for them a grievous Penalty;-
(Their allies deceived them), like the Evil One, when he says to man, "Deny God": but when (man) denies God, (the Evil One) says, "I am free of thee: I do fear God, the Lord of the Worlds!"
The end of both will be that they will go into the Fire, dwelling therein for ever. Such is the reward of the wrong-doers.
O ye who believe! Fear God, and let every soul look to what (provision) He has sent forth for the morrow. Yea, fear God: for God is well-acquainted with (all) that ye do.
And be ye not like those who forgot God; and He made them forget their own souls! Such are the rebellious transgressors!
Not equal are the Companions of the Fire and the Companions of the Garden: it is the Companions of the Garden, that will achieve Felicity.
Had We sent down this Qur'an on a mountain, verily, thou wouldst have seen it humble itself and cleave asunder for fear of God. Such are the similitudes which We propound to men, that they may reflect.
God is He, than Whom there is no other god;- Who knows (all things) both secret and open; He, Most Gracious, Most Merciful.
God is He, than Whom there is no other god;- the Sovereign, the Holy One, the Source of Peace (and Perfection), the Guardian of Faith, the Preserver of Safety, the Exalted in Might, the Irresistible, the Supreme: Glory to God! (High is He) above the partners they attribute to Him.
He is God, the Creator, the Evolver, the Bestower of Forms (or Colours). To Him belong the Most Beautiful Names: whatever is in the heavens and on earth, doth declare His Praises and Glory: and He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
O ye who believe! Take not my enemies and yours as friends (or protectors),- offering them (your) love, even though they have rejected the Truth that has come to you, and have (on the contrary) driven out the Prophet and yourselves (from your homes), (simply) because ye believe in God your Lord! If ye have come out to strive in My Way and to seek My Good Pleasure, (take them not as friends), holding secret converse of love (and friendship) with them: for I know full well all that ye conceal and all that ye reveal. And any of you that does this has strayed from the Straight Path.
If they were to get the better of you, they would behave to you as enemies, and stretch forth their hands and their tongues against you for evil: and they desire that ye should reject the Truth.
Of no profit to you will be your relatives and your children on the Day of Judgment: He will judge between you: for God sees well all that ye do.
There is for you an excellent example (to follow) in Abraham and those with him, when they said to their people: "We are clear of you and of whatever ye worship besides God: we have rejected you, and there has arisen, between us and you, enmity and hatred for ever,- unless ye believe in God and Him alone": But not when Abraham said to his father: "I will pray for forgiveness for thee, though I have no power (to get) aught on thy behalf from God." (They prayed): "Our Lord! in Thee do we trust, and to Thee do we turn in repentance: to Thee is (our) Final Goal.
"Our Lord! Make us not a (test and) trial for the Unbelievers, but forgive us, our Lord! for Thou art the Exalted in Might, the Wise."
There was indeed in them an excellent example for you to follow,- for those whose hope is in God and in the Last Day. But if any turn away, truly God is Free of all Wants, Worthy of all Praise.
It may be that God will grant love (and friendship) between you and those whom ye (now) hold as enemies. For God has power (over all things); And God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
God forbids you not, with regard to those who fight you not for (your) Faith nor drive you out of your homes, from dealing kindly and justly with them: for God loveth those who are just.
God only forbids you, with regard to those who fight you for (your) Faith, and drive you out of your homes, and support (others) in driving you out, from turning to them (for friendship and protection). It is such as turn to them (in these circumstances), that do wrong.
O ye who believe! When there come to you believing women refugees, examine (and test) them: God knows best as to their Faith: if ye ascertain that they are Believers, then send them not back to the Unbelievers. They are not lawful (wives) for the Unbelievers, nor are the (Unbelievers) lawful (husbands) for them. But pay the Unbelievers what they have spent (on their dower), and there will be no blame on you if ye marry them on payment of their dower to them. But hold not to the guardianship of unbelieving women: ask for what ye have spent on their dowers, and let the (Unbelievers) ask for what they have spent (on the dowers of women who come over to you). Such is the command of God: He judges (with justice) between you. And God is Full of Knowledge and Wisdom.
And if any of your wives deserts you to the Unbelievers, and ye have an accession (by the coming over of a woman from the other side), then pay to those whose wives have deserted the equivalent of what they had spent (on their dower). And fear God, in Whom ye believe.
O Prophet! When believing women come to thee to take the oath of fealty to thee, that they will not associate in worship any other thing whatever with God, that they will not steal, that they will not commit adultery (or fornication), that they will not kill their children, that they will not utter slander, intentionally forging falsehood, and that they will not disobey thee in any just matter,- then do thou receive their fealty, and pray to God for the forgiveness (of their sins): for God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O ye who believe! Turn not (for friendship) to people on whom is the Wrath of God, of the Hereafter they are already in despair, just as the Unbelievers are in despair about those (buried) in graves.
Whatever is in the heavens and on earth, let it declare the Praises and Glory of God: for He is the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
O ye who believe! Why say ye that which ye do not?
Grievously odious is it in the sight of God that ye say that which ye do not.
Truly God loves those who fight in His Cause in battle array, as if they were a solid cemented structure.
And remember, Moses said to his people: "O my people! why do ye vex and insult me, though ye know that I am the apostle of God (sent) to you?" Then when they went wrong, God let their hearts go wrong. For God guides not those who are rebellious transgressors.
And remember, Jesus, the son of Mary, said: "O Children of Israel! I am the apostle of God (sent) to you, confirming the Law (which came) before me, and giving Glad Tidings of an Apostle to come after me, whose name shall be Ahmad." But when he came to them with Clear Signs, they said, "this is evident sorcery!"
Who doth greater wrong than one who invents falsehood against God, even as he is being invited to Islam? And God guides not those who do wrong.
Their intention is to extinguish God's Light (by blowing) with their mouths: But God will complete (the revelation of) His Light, even though the Unbelievers may detest (it).
It is He Who has sent His Apostle with Guidance and the Religion of Truth, that he may proclaim it over all religion, even though the Pagans may detest (it).
O ye who believe! Shall I lead you to a bargain that will save you from a grievous Penalty?-
That ye believe in God and His Apostle, and that ye strive (your utmost) in the Cause of God, with your property and your persons: That will be best for you, if ye but knew!
He will forgive you your sins, and admit you to Gardens beneath which Rivers flow, and to beautiful mansions in Gardens of Eternity: that is indeed the Supreme Achievement.
And another (favour will He bestow,) which ye do love,- help from God and a speedy victory. So give the Glad Tidings to the Believers.
O ye who believe! Be ye helpers of God: As said Jesus the son of Mary to the Disciples, "Who will be my helpers to (the work of) God?" Said the disciples, "We are God's helpers!" then a portion of the Children of Israel believed, and a portion disbelieved: But We gave power to those who believed, against their enemies, and they became the ones that prevailed.
Whatever is in the heavens and on earth, doth declare the Praises and Glory of God,- the Sovereign, the Holy One, the Exalted in Might, the Wise.
It is He Who has sent amongst the Unlettered an apostle from among themselves, to rehearse to them His Signs, to sanctify them, and to instruct them in Scripture and Wisdom,- although they had been, before, in manifest error;-
As well as (to confer all these benefits upon) others of them, who have not already joined them: And He is exalted in Might, Wise.
Such is the Bounty of God, which He bestows on whom He will: and God is the Lord of the highest bounty.
The similitude of those who were charged with the (obligations of the) Mosaic Law, but who subsequently failed in those (obligations), is that of a donkey which carries huge tomes (but understands them not). Evil is the similitude of people who falsify the Signs of God: and God guides not people who do wrong.
Say: "O ye that stand on Judaism! If ye think that ye are friends to God, to the exclusion of (other) men, then express your desire for Death, if ye are truthful!"
But never will they express their desire (for Death), because of the (deeds) their hands have sent on before them! and God knows well those that do wrong!
Say: "The Death from which ye flee will truly overtake you: then will ye be sent back to the Knower of things secret and open: and He will tell you (the truth of) the things that ye did!"
O ye who believe! When the call is proclaimed to prayer on Friday (the Day of Assembly), hasten earnestly to the Remembrance of God, and leave off business (and traffic): That is best for you if ye but knew!
And when the Prayer is finished, then may ye disperse through the land, and seek of the Bounty of God: and celebrate the Praises of God often (and without stint): that ye may prosper.
But when they see some bargain or some amusement, they disperse headlong to it, and leave thee standing. Say: "The (blessing) from the Presence of God is better than any amusement or bargain! and God is the Best to provide (for all needs)."
When the Hypocrites come to thee, they say, "We bear witness that thou art indeed the Apostle of God." Yea, God knoweth that thou art indeed His Apostle, and God beareth witness that the Hypocrites are indeed liars.
They have made their oaths a screen (for their misdeeds): thus they obstruct (men) from the Path of God: truly evil are their deeds.
That is because they believed, then they rejected Faith: So a seal was set on their hearts: therefore they understand not.
When thou lookest at them, their exteriors please thee; and when they speak, thou listenest to their words. They are as (worthless as hollow) pieces of timber propped up, (unable to stand on their own). They think that every cry is against them. They are the enemies; so beware of them. The curse of God be on them! How are they deluded (away from the Truth)!
And when it is said to them, "Come, the Apostle of God will pray for your forgiveness", they turn aside their heads, and thou wouldst see them turning away their faces in arrogance.
It is equal to them whether thou pray for their forgiveness or not. God will not forgive them. Truly God guides not rebellious transgressors.
They are the ones who say, "Spend nothing on those who are with God's Apostle, to the end that they may disperse (and quit Medina)." But to God belong the treasures of the heavens and the earth; but the Hypocrites understand not.
They say, "If we return to Medina, surely the more honourable (element) will expel therefrom the meaner." But honour belongs to God and His Apostle, and to the Believers; but the Hypocrites know not.
O ye who believe! Let not your riches or your children divert you from the remembrance of God. If any act thus, the loss is their own.
and spend something (in charity) out of the substance which We have bestowed on you, before Death should come to any of you and he should say, "O my Lord! why didst Thou not give me respite for a little while? I should then have given (largely) in charity, and I should have been one of the doers of good".
But to no soul will God grant respite when the time appointed (for it) has come; and God is well acquainted with (all) that ye do.
Whatever is in the heavens and on earth, doth declare the Praises and Glory of God: to Him belongs dominion, and to Him belongs praise: and He has power over all things.
It is He Who has created you; and of you are some that are Unbelievers, and some that are Believers: and God sees well all that ye do.
He has created the heavens and the earth in just proportions, and has given you shape, and made your shapes beautiful: and to Him is the final Goal.
He knows what is in the heavens and on earth; and He knows what ye conceal and what ye reveal: yea, God knows well the (secrets) of (all) hearts.
Has not the story reached you, of those who rejected Faith aforetime? So they tasted the evil result of their conduct; and they had a grievous Penalty.
That was because there came to them apostles with Clear Signs, but they said: "Shall (mere) human beings direct us?" So they rejected (the Message) and turned away. But God can do without (them): and God is free of all needs, worthy of all praise.
The Unbelievers think that they will not be raised up (for Judgment). Say: "Yea, By my Lord, Ye shall surely be raised up: then shall ye be told (the truth) of all that ye did. And that is easy for God."
Believe, therefore, in God and His Apostle, and in the Light which we have sent down. And God is well acquainted with all that ye do.
The Day that He assembles you (all) for a Day of Assembly,- that will be a Day of mutual loss and gain (among you), and those who believe in God and work righteousness,- He will remove from them their ills, and He will admit them to Gardens beneath which Rivers flow, to dwell therein for ever: that will be the Supreme Achievement.
But those who reject Faith and treat Our Signs as falsehoods, they will be Companions of the Fire, to dwell therein for aye: and evil is that Goal.
No kind of calamity can occur, except by the leave of God: and if any one believes in God, (God) guides his heart (aright): for God knows all things.
So obey God, and obey His Apostle: but if ye turn back, the duty of Our Apostle is but to proclaim (the Message) clearly and openly.
God! There is no god but He: and on God, therefore, let the Believers put their trust.
O ye who believe! Truly, among your wives and your children are (some that are) enemies to yourselves: so beware of them! But if ye forgive and overlook, and cover up (their faults), verily God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
Your riches and your children may be but a trial: but in the Presence of God, is the highest, Reward.
So fear God as much as ye can; listen and obey and spend in charity for the benefit of your own soul and those saved from the covetousness of their own souls,- they are the ones that achieve prosperity.
If ye loan to God, a beautiful loan, He will double it to your (credit), and He will grant you Forgiveness: for God is most Ready to appreciate (service), Most Forbearing,-
Knower of what is open, Exalted in Might, Full of Wisdom.
O Prophet! When ye do divorce women, divorce them at their prescribed periods, and count (accurately), their prescribed periods: And fear God your Lord: and turn them not out of their houses, nor shall they (themselves) leave, except in case they are guilty of some open lewdness, those are limits set by God: and any who transgresses the limits of God, does verily wrong his (own) soul: thou knowest not if perchance God will bring about thereafter some new situation.
Thus when they fulfil their term appointed, either take them back on equitable terms or part with them on equitable terms; and take for witness two persons from among you, endued with justice, and establish the evidence (as) before God. Such is the admonition given to him who believes in God and the Last Day. And for those who fear God, He (ever) prepares a way out,
And He provides for him from (sources) he never could imagine. And if any one puts his trust in God, sufficient is (God) for him. For God will surely accomplish his purpose: verily, for all things has God appointed a due proportion.
Such of your women as have passed the age of monthly courses, for them the prescribed period, if ye have any doubts, is three months, and for those who have no courses (it is the same): for those who carry (life within their wombs), their period is until they deliver their burdens: and for those who fear God, He will make their path easy.
That is the Command of God, which He has sent down to you: and if any one fears God, He will remove his ills, from him, and will enlarge his reward.
Let the women live (in 'iddat) in the same style as ye live, according to your means: Annoy them not, so as to restrict them. And if they carry (life in their wombs), then spend (your substance) on them until they deliver their burden: and if they suckle your (offspring), give them their recompense: and take mutual counsel together, according to what is just and reasonable. And if ye find yourselves in difficulties, let another woman suckle (the child) on the (father's) behalf.
Let the man of means spend according to his means: and the man whose resources are restricted, let him spend according to what God has given him. God puts no burden on any person beyond what He has given him. After a difficulty, God will soon grant relief.
How many populations that insolently opposed the Command of their Lord and of His apostles, did We not then call to account,- to severe account?- and We imposed on them an exemplary Punishment.
Then did they taste the evil result of their conduct, and the End of their conduct was Perdition.
God has prepared for them a severe Punishment (in the Hereafter). Therefore fear God, O ye men of understanding - who have believed!- for God hath indeed sent down to you a Message,-
An Apostle, who rehearses to you the Signs of God containing clear explanations, that he may lead forth those who believe and do righteous deeds from the depths of Darkness into Light. And those who believe in God and work righteousness, He will admit to Gardens beneath which Rivers flow, to dwell therein for ever: God has indeed granted for them a most excellent Provision.
God is He Who created seven Firmaments and of the earth a similar number. Through the midst of them (all) descends His Command: that ye may know that God has power over all things, and that God comprehends, all things in (His) Knowledge.
O Prophet! Why holdest thou to be forbidden that which God has made lawful to thee? Thou seekest to please thy consorts. But God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
God has already ordained for you, (O men), the dissolution of your oaths (in some cases): and God is your Protector, and He is Full of Knowledge and Wisdom.
When the Prophet disclosed a matter in confidence to one of his consorts, and she then divulged it (to another), and God made it known to him, he confirmed part thereof and repudiated a part. Then when he told her thereof, she said, "Who told thee this? "He said, "He told me Who knows and is well-acquainted (with all things)."
If ye two turn in repentance to Him, your hearts are indeed so inclined; But if ye back up each other against him, truly God is his Protector, and Gabriel, and (every) righteous one among those who believe,- and furthermore, the angels - will back (him) up.
It may be, if he divorced you (all), that God will give him in exchange consorts better than you,- who submit (their wills), who believe, who are devout, who turn to God in repentance, who worship (in humility), who travel (for Faith) and fast,- previously married or virgins.
O ye who believe! save yourselves and your families from a Fire whose fuel is Men and Stones, over which are (appointed) angels stern (and) severe, who flinch not (from executing) the Commands they receive from God, but do (precisely) what they are commanded.
(They will say), "O ye Unbelievers! Make no excuses this Day! Ye are being but requited for all that ye did!"
O ye who believe! Turn to God with sincere repentance: In the hope that your Lord will remove from you your ills and admit you to Gardens beneath which Rivers flow,- the Day that God will not permit to be humiliated the Prophet and those who believe with him. Their Light will run forward before them and by their right hands, while they say, "Our Lord! Perfect our Light for us, and grant us Forgiveness: for Thou hast power over all things."
O Prophet! Strive hard against the Unbelievers and the Hypocrites, and be firm against them. Their abode is Hell,- an evil refuge (indeed).
God sets forth, for an example to the Unbelievers, the wife of Noah and the wife of Lut: they were (respectively) under two of our righteous servants, but they were false to their (husbands), and they profited nothing before God on their account, but were told: "Enter ye the Fire along with (others) that enter!"
And God sets forth, as an example to those who believe the wife of Pharaoh: Behold she said: "O my Lord! Build for me, in nearness to Thee, a mansion in the Garden, and save me from Pharaoh and his doings, and save me from those that do wrong";
And Mary the daughter of 'Imran, who guarded her chastity; and We breathed into (her body) of Our spirit; and she testified to the truth of the words of her Lord and of His Revelations, and was one of the devout (servants).
Blessed be He in Whose hands is Dominion; and He over all things hath Power;-
He Who created Death and Life, that He may try which of you is best in deed: and He is the Exalted in Might, Oft-Forgiving;-
He Who created the seven heavens one above another: No want of proportion wilt thou see in the Creation of (God) Most Gracious. So turn thy vision again: seest thou any flaw?
Again turn thy vision a second time: (thy) vision will come back to thee dull and discomfited, in a state worn out.
And we have, (from of old), adorned the lowest heaven with Lamps, and We have made such (Lamps) (as) missiles to drive away the Evil Ones, and have prepared for them the Penalty of the Blazing Fire.
For those who reject their Lord (and Cherisher) is the Penalty of Hell: and evil is (such), Destination.
When they are cast therein, they will hear the (terrible) drawing in of its breath even as it blazes forth,
Almost bursting with fury: Every time a Group is cast therein, its Keepers will ask, "Did no Warner come to you?"
They will say: "Yes indeed; a Warner did come to us, but we rejected him and said, 'God never sent down any (Message): ye are nothing but an egregious delusion!'"
They will further say: "Had we but listened or used our intelligence, we should not (now) be among the Companions of the Blazing Fire!"
They will then confess their sins: but far will be (Forgiveness) from the Companions of the Blazing Fire!
As for those who fear their Lord unseen, for them is Forgiveness and a great Reward.
And whether ye hide your word or publish it, He certainly has (full) knowledge, of the secrets of (all) hearts.
Should He not know,- He that created? and He is the One that understands the finest mysteries (and) is well-acquainted (with them).
It is He Who has made the earth manageable for you, so traverse ye through its tracts and enjoy of the Sustenance which He furnishes: but unto Him is the Resurrection.
Do ye feel secure that He Who is in heaven will not cause you to be swallowed up by the earth when it shakes (as in an earthquake)?
Or do ye feel secure that He Who is in Heaven will not send against you a violent tornado (with showers of stones), so that ye shall know how (terrible) was My warning?
But indeed men before them rejected (My warning): then how (terrible) was My rejection (of them)?
Do they not observe the birds above them, spreading their wings and folding them in? None can uphold them except (God) Most Gracious: Truly (God) Most Gracious: Truly it is He that watches over all things.
Nay, who is there that can help you, (even as) an army, besides (God) Most Merciful? In nothing but delusion are the Unbelievers.
Or who is there that can provide you with Sustenance if He were to withhold His provision? Nay, they obstinately persist in insolent impiety and flight (from the Truth).
Is then one who walks headlong, with his face grovelling, better guided,- or one who walks evenly on a Straight Way?
Say: "It is He Who has created you (and made you grow), and made for you the faculties of hearing, seeing, feeling and understanding: little thanks it is ye give.
Say: "It is He Who has multiplied you through the earth, and to Him shall ye be gathered together."
They ask: When will this promise be (fulfilled)? - If ye are telling the truth.
Say: "As to the knowledge of the time, it is with God alone: I am (sent) only to warn plainly in public."
At length, when they see it close at hand, grieved will be the faces of the Unbelievers, and it will be said (to them): "This is (the promise fulfilled), which ye were calling for!"
Say: "See ye?- If God were to destroy me, and those with me, or if He bestows His Mercy on us,- yet who can deliver the Unbelievers from a grievous Penalty?"
Say: "He is (God) Most Gracious: We have believed in Him, and on Him have we put our trust: So, soon will ye know which (of us) it is that is in manifest error."
Say: "See ye?- If your stream be some morning lost (in the underground earth), who then can supply you with clear-flowing water?"
Nun. By the Pen and the (Record) which (men) write,-
Thou art not, by the Grace of thy Lord, mad or possessed.
Nay, verily for thee is a Reward unfailing:
And thou (standest) on an exalted standard of character.
Soon wilt thou see, and they will see,
Which of you is afflicted with madness.
Verily it is thy Lord that knoweth best, which (among men) hath strayed from His Path: and He knoweth best those who receive (true) Guidance.
So hearken not to those who deny (the Truth).
Their desire is that thou shouldst be pliant: so would they be pliant.
Heed not the type of despicable men,- ready with oaths,
A slanderer, going about with calumnies,
(Habitually) hindering (all) good, transgressing beyond bounds, deep in sin,
Violent (and cruel),- with all that, base-born,-
Because he possesses wealth and (numerous) sons.
When to him are rehearsed Our Signs, "Tales of the ancients", he cries!
Soon shall We brand (the beast) on the snout!
Verily We have tried them as We tried the People of the Garden, when they resolved to gather the fruits of the (garden) in the morning.
But made no reservation, ("If it be God's Will").
Then there came on the (garden) a visitation from thy Lord, (which swept away) all around, while they were asleep.
So the (garden) became, by the morning, like a dark and desolate spot, (whose fruit had been gathered).
As the morning broke, they called out, one to another,-
"Go ye to your tilth (betimes) in the morning, if ye would gather the fruits."
So they departed, conversing in secret low tones, (saying)-
"Let not a single indigent person break in upon you into the (garden) this day."
And they opened the morning, strong in an (unjust) resolve.
But when they saw the (garden), they said: "We have surely lost our way:
"Indeed we are shut out (of the fruits of our labour)!"
Said one of them, more just (than the rest): "Did I not say to you, 'Why not glorify (God)?'"
They said: "Glory to our Lord! Verily we have been doing wrong!"
Then they turned, one against another, in reproach.
They said: "Alas for us! We have indeed transgressed!
"It may be that our Lord will give us in exchange a better (garden) than this: for we do turn to Him (in repentance)!"
Such is the Punishment (in this life); but greater is the Punishment in the Hereafter,- if only they knew!
Verily, for the Righteous, are Gardens of Delight, in the Presence of their Lord.
Shall We then treat the People of Faith like the People of Sin?
What is the matter with you? How judge ye?
Or have ye a book through which ye learn-
That ye shall have, through it whatever ye choose?
Or have ye Covenants with Us to oath, reaching to the Day of Judgment, (providing) that ye shall have whatever ye shall demand?
Ask thou of them, which of them will stand surety for that!
Or have they some "Partners" (in Godhead)? Then let them produce their "partners", if they are truthful!
The Day that the shin shall be laid bare, and they shall be summoned to bow in adoration, but they shall not be able,-
Their eyes will be cast down,- ignominy will cover them; seeing that they had been summoned aforetime to bow in adoration, while they were whole, (and had refused).
Then leave Me alone with such as reject this Message: by degrees shall We punish them from directions they perceive not.
A (long) respite will I grant them: truly powerful is My Plan.
Or is it that thou dost ask them for a reward, so that they are burdened with a load of debt?-
Or that the Unseen is in their hands, so that they can write it down?
So wait with patience for the Command of thy Lord, and be not like the Companion of the Fish,- when he cried out in agony.
Had not Grace from his Lord reached him, he would indeed have been cast off on the naked shore, in disgrace.
Thus did his Lord choose him and make him of the Company of the Righteous.
And the Unbelievers would almost trip thee up with their eyes when they hear the Message; and they say: "Surely he is possessed!"
But it is nothing less than a Message to all the worlds.
The Sure Reality!
What is the Sure Reality?
And what will make thee realise what the Sure Reality is?
The Thamud and the 'Ad People (branded) as false the Stunning Calamity!
But the Thamud,- they were destroyed by a terrible Storm of thunder and lightning!
And the 'Ad, they were destroyed by a furious Wind, exceedingly violent;
He made it rage against them seven nights and eight days in succession: so that thou couldst see the (whole) people lying prostrate in its (path), as they had been roots of hollow palm-trees tumbled down!
Then seest thou any of them left surviving?
And Pharaoh, and those before him, and the Cities Overthrown, committed habitual Sin.
And disobeyed (each) the apostle of their Lord; so He punished them with an abundant Penalty.
We, when the water (of Noah's Flood) overflowed beyond its limits, carried you (mankind), in the floating (Ark),
That We might make it a Message unto you, and that ears (that should hear the tale and) retain its memory should bear its (lessons) in remembrance.
Then, when one blast is sounded on the Trumpet,
And the earth is moved, and its mountains, and they are crushed to powder at one stroke,-
On that Day shall the (Great) Event come to pass.
And the sky will be rent asunder, for it will that Day be flimsy,
And the angels will be on its sides, and eight will, that Day, bear the Throne of thy Lord above them.
That Day shall ye be brought to Judgment: not an act of yours that ye hide will be hidden.
Then he that will be given his Record in his right hand will say: "Ah here! Read ye my Record!
"I did really understand that my Account would (One Day) reach me!"
And he will be in a life of Bliss,
In a Garden on high,
The Fruits whereof (will hang in bunches) low and near.
"Eat ye and drink ye, with full satisfaction; because of the (good) that ye sent before you, in the days that are gone!"
And he that will be given his Record in his left hand, will say: "Ah! Would that my Record had not been given to me!
"And that I had never realised how my account (stood)!
"Ah! Would that (Death) had made an end of me!
"Of no profit to me has been my wealth!
"My power has perished from me!"...
(The stern command will say): "Seize ye him, and bind ye him,
"And burn ye him in the Blazing Fire.
"Further, make him march in a chain, whereof the length is seventy cubits!
"This was he that would not believe in God Most High.
"And would not encourage the feeding of the indigent!
"So no friend hath he here this Day.
"Nor hath he any food except the corruption from the washing of wounds,
"Which none do eat but those in sin."
So I do call to witness what ye see,
And what ye see not,
That this is verily the word of an honoured apostle;
It is not the word of a poet: little it is ye believe!
Nor is it the word of a soothsayer: little admonition it is ye receive.
(This is) a Message sent down from the Lord of the Worlds.
And if the apostle were to invent any sayings in Our name,
We should certainly seize him by his right hand,
And We should certainly then cut off the artery of his heart:
Nor could any of you withhold him (from Our wrath).
But verily this is a Message for the God-fearing.
And We certainly know that there are amongst you those that reject (it).
But truly (Revelation) is a cause of sorrow for the Unbelievers.
But verily it is Truth of assured certainty.
So glorify the name of thy Lord Most High.
A questioner asked about a Penalty to befall-
The Unbelievers, the which there is none to ward off,-
(A Penalty) from God, Lord of the Ways of Ascent.
The angels and the spirit ascend unto him in a Day the measure whereof is (as) fifty thousand years:
Therefore do thou hold Patience,- a Patience of beautiful (contentment).
They see the (Day) indeed as a far-off (event):
But We see it (quite) near.
The Day that the sky will be like molten brass,
And the mountains will be like wool,
And no friend will ask after a friend,
Though they will be put in sight of each other,- the sinner's desire will be: Would that he could redeem himself from the Penalty of that Day by (sacrificing) his children,
His wife and his brother,
His kindred who sheltered him,
And all, all that is on earth,- so it could deliver him:
By no means! for it would be the Fire of Hell!-
Plucking out (his being) right to the skull!-
Inviting (all) such as turn their backs and turn away their faces (from the Right).
And collect (wealth) and hide it (from use)!
Truly man was created very impatient;-
Fretful when evil touches him;
And niggardly when good reaches him;-
Not so those devoted to Prayer;-
Those who remain steadfast to their prayer;
And those in whose wealth is a recognised right.
For the (needy) who asks and him who is prevented (for some reason from asking);
And those who hold to the truth of the Day of Judgment;
And those who fear the displeasure of their Lord,-
For their Lord's displeasure is the opposite of Peace and Tranquillity;-
And those who guard their chastity,
Except with their wives and the (captives) whom their right hands possess,- for (then) they are not to be blamed,
But those who trespass beyond this are transgressors;-
And those who respect their trusts and covenants;
And those who stand firm in their testimonies;
And those who guard (the sacredness) of their worship;-
Such will be the honoured ones in the Gardens (of Bliss).
Now what is the matter with the Unbelievers that they rush madly before thee-
From the right and from the left, in crowds?
Does every man of them long to enter the Garden of Bliss?
By no means! For We have created them out of the (base matter) they know!
Now I do call to witness the Lord of all points in the East and the West that We can certainly-
Substitute for them better (men) than they; And We are not to be defeated (in Our Plan).
So leave them to plunge in vain talk and play about, until they encounter that Day of theirs which they have been promised!-
The Day whereon they will issue from their sepulchres in sudden haste as if they were rushing to a goal-post (fixed for them),-
Their eyes lowered in dejection,- ignominy covering them (all over)! such is the Day the which they are promised!
We sent Noah to his People (with the Command): "Do thou warn thy People before there comes to them a grievous Penalty."
He said: "O my People! I am to you a Warner, clear and open:
"That ye should worship God, fear Him and obey me:
"So He may forgive you your sins and give you respite for a stated Term: for when the Term given by God is accomplished, it cannot be put forward: if ye only knew."
He said: "O my Lord! I have called to my People night and day:
"But my call only increases (their) flight (from the Right).
"And every time I have called to them, that Thou mightest forgive them, they have (only) thrust their fingers into their ears, covered themselves up with their garments, grown obstinate, and given themselves up to arrogance.
"So I have called to them aloud;
"Further I have spoken to them in public and secretly in private,
"Saying, 'Ask forgiveness from your Lord; for He is Oft-Forgiving;
"'He will send rain to you in abundance;
"'Give you increase in wealth and sons; and bestow on you gardens and bestow on you rivers (of flowing water).
"'What is the matter with you, that ye place not your hope for kindness and long-suffering in God,-
"'Seeing that it is He that has created you in diverse stages?
"'See ye not how God has created the seven heavens one above another,
"'And made the moon a light in their midst, and made the sun as a (Glorious) Lamp?
"'And God has produced you from the earth growing (gradually),
"'And in the End He will return you into the (earth), and raise you forth (again at the Resurrection)?
"'And God has made the earth for you as a carpet (spread out),
"'That ye may go about therein, in spacious roads.'"
Noah said: "O my Lord! They have disobeyed me, but they follow (men) whose wealth and children give them no increase but only Loss.
"And they have devised a tremendous Plot.
"And they have said (to each other), 'Abandon not your gods: Abandon neither Wadd nor Suwa', neither Yaguth nor Ya'uq, nor Nasr';-
"They have already misled many; and grant Thou no increase to the wrong- doers but in straying (from their mark)."
Because of their sins they were drowned (in the flood), and were made to enter the Fire (of Punishment): and they found- in lieu of God- none to help them.
And Noah, said: "O my Lord! Leave not of the Unbelievers, a single one on earth!
"For, if Thou dost leave (any of) them, they will but mislead Thy devotees, and they will breed none but wicked ungrateful ones.
"O my Lord! Forgive me, my parents, all who enter my house in Faith, and (all) believing men and believing women: and to the wrong-doers grant Thou no increase but in perdition!"
Say: It has been revealed to me that a company of Jinns listened (to the Qur'an). They said, 'We have really heard a wonderful Recital!
'It gives guidance to the Right, and we have believed therein: we shall not join (in worship) any (gods) with our Lord.
'And Exalted is the Majesty of our Lord: He has taken neither a wife nor a son.
'There were some foolish ones among us, who used to utter extravagant lies against God;
'But we do think that no man or spirit should say aught that untrue against God.
'True, there were persons among mankind who took shelter with persons among the Jinns, but they increased them in folly.
'And they (came to) think as ye thought, that God would not raise up any one (to Judgment).
'And we pried into the secrets of heaven; but we found it filled with stern guards and flaming fires.
'We used, indeed, to sit there in (hidden) stations, to (steal) a hearing; but any who listen now will find a flaming fire watching him in ambush.
'And we understand not whether ill is intended to those on earth, or whether their Lord (really) intends to guide them to right conduct.
'There are among us some that are righteous, and some the contrary: we follow divergent paths.
'But we think that we can by no means frustrate God throughout the earth, nor can we frustrate Him by flight.
'And as for us, since we have listened to the Guidance, we have accepted it: and any who believes in his Lord has no fear, either of a short (account) or of any injustice.
'Amongst us are some that submit their wills (to God), and some that swerve from justice. Now those who submit their wills - they have sought out (the path) of right conduct:
'But those who swerve,- they are (but) fuel for Hell-fire'-
(And God's Message is): "If they (the Pagans) had (only) remained on the (right) Way, We should certainly have bestowed on them Rain in abundance.
"That We might try them by that (means). But if any turns away from the remembrance of his Lord, He will cause him to undergo a severe Penalty.
"And the places of worship are for God (alone): So invoke not any one along with God;
"Yet when the Devotee of God stands forth to invoke Him, they just make round him a dense crowd."
Say: "I do no more than invoke my Lord, and I join not with Him any (false god)."
Say: "It is not in my power to cause you harm, or to bring you to right conduct."
Say: "No one can deliver me from God (If I were to disobey Him), nor should I find refuge except in Him,
"Unless I proclaim what I receive from God and His Messages: for any that disobey God and His Apostle,- for them is Hell: they shall dwell therein for ever."
At length, when they see (with their own eyes) that which they are promised,- then will they know who it is that is weakest in (his) helper and least important in point of numbers.
Say: "I know not whether the (Punishment) which ye are promised is near, or whether my Lord will appoint for it a distant term.
"He (alone) knows the Unseen, nor does He make any one acquainted with His Mysteries,-
"Except an apostle whom He has chosen: and then He makes a band of watchers march before him and behind him,
"That He may know that they have (truly) brought and delivered the Messages of their Lord: and He surrounds (all the mysteries) that are with them, and takes account of every single thing."
O thou folded in garments!
Stand (to prayer) by night, but not all night,-
Half of it,- or a little less,
Or a little more; and recite the Qur'an in slow, measured rhythmic tones.
Soon shall We send down to thee a weighty Message.
Truly the rising by night is most potent for governing (the soul), and most suitable for (framing) the Word (of Prayer and Praise).
True, there is for thee by day prolonged occupation with ordinary duties:
But keep in remembrance the name of thy Lord and devote thyself to Him whole-heartedly.
(He is) Lord of the East and the West: there is no god but He: take Him therefore for (thy) Disposer of Affairs.
And have patience with what they say, and leave them with noble (dignity).
And leave Me (alone to deal with) those in possession of the good things of life, who (yet) deny the Truth; and bear with them for a little while.
With Us are Fetters (to bind them), and a Fire (to burn them),
And a Food that chokes, and a Penalty Grievous.
One Day the earth and the mountains will be in violent commotion. And the mountains will be as a heap of sand poured out and flowing down.
We have sent to you, (O men!) an apostle, to be a witness concerning you, even as We sent an apostle to Pharaoh.
But Pharaoh disobeyed the apostle; so We seized him with a heavy Punishment.
Then how shall ye, if ye deny (God), guard yourselves against a Day that will make children hoary-headed?-
Whereon the sky will be cleft asunder? His Promise needs must be accomplished.
Verily this is an Admonition: therefore, whoso will, let him take a (straight) path to his Lord!
Thy Lord doth know that thou standest forth (to prayer) nigh two-thirds of the night, or half the night, or a third of the night, and so doth a party of those with thee. But God doth appoint night and day in due measure He knoweth that ye are unable to keep count thereof. So He hath turned to you (in mercy): read ye, therefore, of the Qur'an as much as may be easy for you. He knoweth that there may be (some) among you in ill-health; others travelling through the land, seeking of God's bounty; yet others fighting in God's Cause, read ye, therefore, as much of the Qur'an as may be easy (for you); and establish regular Prayer and give regular Charity; and loan to God a Beautiful Loan. And whatever good ye send forth for your souls ye shall find it in God's Presence,- yea, better and greater, in Reward and seek ye the Grace of God: for God is Oft-Forgiving, Most Merciful.
O thou wrapped up (in the mantle)!
Arise and deliver thy warning!
And thy Lord do thou magnify!
And thy garments keep free from stain!
And all abomination shun!
Nor expect, in giving, any increase (for thyself)!
But, for thy Lord's (Cause), be patient and constant!
Finally, when the Trumpet is sounded,
That will be- that Day - a Day of Distress,-
Far from easy for those without Faith.
Leave Me alone, (to deal) with the (creature) whom I created (bare and) alone!-
To whom I granted resources in abundance,
And sons to be by his side!-
To whom I made (life) smooth and comfortable!
Yet is he greedy-that I should add (yet more);-
By no means! For to Our Signs he has been refractory!
Soon will I visit him with a mount of calamities!
For he thought and he plotted;-
And woe to him! How he plotted!-
Yea, Woe to him; How he plotted!-
Then he looked round;
Then he frowned and he scowled;
Then he turned back and was haughty;
Then said he: "This is nothing but magic, derived from of old;
"This is nothing but the word of a mortal!"
Soon will I cast him into Hell-Fire!
And what will explain to thee what Hell-Fire is?
Naught doth it permit to endure, and naught doth it leave alone!-
Darkening and changing the colour of man!
Over it are Nineteen.
And We have set none but angels as Guardians of the Fire; and We have fixed their number only as a trial for Unbelievers,- in order that the People of the Book may arrive at certainty, and the Believers may increase in Faith,- and that no doubts may be left for the People of the Book and the Believers, and that those in whose hearts is a disease and the Unbelievers may say, "What symbol doth God intend by this ?" Thus doth God leave to stray whom He pleaseth, and guide whom He pleaseth: and none can know the forces of thy Lord, except He and this is no other than a warning to mankind.
Nay, verily: By the Moon,
And by the Night as it retreateth,
And by the Dawn as it shineth forth,-
This is but one of the mighty (portents),
A warning to mankind,-
To any of you that chooses to press forward, or to follow behind;-
Every soul will be (held) in pledge for its deeds.
Except the Companions of the Right Hand.
(They will be) in Gardens (of Delight): they will question each other,
And (ask) of the Sinners:
"What led you into Hell Fire?"
They will say: "We were not of those who prayed;
"Nor were we of those who fed the indigent;
"But we used to talk vanities with vain talkers;
"And we used to deny the Day of Judgment,
"Until there came to us (the Hour) that is certain."
Then will no intercession of (any) intercessors profit them.
Then what is the matter with them that they turn away from admonition?-
As if they were affrighted asses,
Fleeing from a lion!
Forsooth, each one of them wants to be given scrolls (of revelation) spread out!
By no means! But they fear not the Hereafter,
Nay, this surely is an admonition:
Let any who will, keep it in remembrance!
But none will keep it in remembrance except as God wills: He is the Lord of Righteousness, and the Lord of Forgiveness.
I do call to witness the Resurrection Day;
And I do call to witness the self-reproaching spirit: (Eschew Evil).
Does man think that We cannot assemble his bones?
Nay, We are able to put together in perfect order the very tips of his fingers.
But man wishes to do wrong (even) in the time in front of him.
He questions: "When is the Day of Resurrection?"
At length, when the sight is dazed,
And the moon is buried in darkness.
And the sun and moon are joined together,-
That Day will Man say: "Where is the refuge?"
By no means! No place of safety!
Before thy Lord (alone), that Day will be the place of rest.
That Day will Man be told (all) that he put forward, and all that he put back.
Nay, man will be evidence against himself,
Even though he were to put up his excuses.
Move not thy tongue concerning the (Qur'an) to make haste therewith.
It is for Us to collect it and to promulgate it:
But when We have promulgated it, follow thou its recital (as promulgated):
Nay more, it is for Us to explain it (and make it clear):
Nay, (ye men!) but ye love the fleeting life,
And leave alone the Hereafter.
Some faces, that Day, will beam (in brightness and beauty);-
Looking towards their Lord;
And some faces, that Day, will be sad and dismal,
In the thought that some back-breaking calamity was about to be inflicted on them;
Yea, when (the soul) reaches to the collar-bone (in its exit),
And there will be a cry, "Who is a magician (to restore him)?"
And he will conclude that it was (the Time) of Parting;
And one leg will be joined with another:
That Day the Drive will be (all) to thy Lord!
So he gave nothing in charity, nor did he pray!-
But on the contrary, he rejected Truth and turned away!
Then did he stalk to his family in full conceit!
Woe to thee, (O men!), yea, woe!
Again, Woe to thee, (O men!), yea, woe!
Does man think that he will be left uncontrolled, (without purpose)?
Was he not a drop of sperm emitted (in lowly form)?
Then did he become a leech-like clot; then did (God) make and fashion (him) in due proportion.
And of him He made two sexes, male and female.
Has not He, (the same), the power to give life to the dead?
Has there not been over Man a long period of Time, when he was nothing - (not even) mentioned?
Verily We created Man from a drop of mingled sperm, in order to try him: So We gave him (the gifts), of Hearing and Sight.
We showed him the Way: whether he be grateful or ungrateful (rests on his will).
For the Rejecters we have prepared chains, yokes, and a blazing Fire.
As to the Righteous, they shall drink of a Cup (of Wine) mixed with Kafur,-
A Fountain where the Devotees of God do drink, making it flow in unstinted abundance.
They perform (their) vows, and they fear a Day whose evil flies far and wide.
And they feed, for the love of God, the indigent, the orphan, and the captive,-
(Saying),"We feed you for the sake of God alone: no reward do we desire from you, nor thanks.
"We only fear a Day of distressful Wrath from the side of our Lord."
But God will deliver them from the evil of that Day, and will shed over them a Light of Beauty and (blissful) Joy.
And because they were patient and constant, He will reward them with a Garden and (garments of) silk.
Reclining in the (Garden) on raised thrones, they will see there neither the sun's (excessive heat) nor (the moon's) excessive cold.
And the shades of the (Garden) will come low over them, and the bunches (of fruit), there, will hang low in humility.
And amongst them will be passed round vessels of silver and goblets of crystal,-
Crystal-clear, made of silver: they will determine the measure thereof (according to their wishes).
And they will be given to drink there of a Cup (of Wine) mixed with Zanjabil,-
A fountain there, called Salsabil.
And round about them will (serve) youths of perpetual (freshness): If thou seest them, thou wouldst think them scattered Pearls.
And when thou lookest, it is there thou wilt see a Bliss and a Realm Magnificent.
Upon them will be green Garments of fine silk and heavy brocade, and they will be adorned with Bracelets of silver; and their Lord will give to them to drink of a Wine Pure and Holy.
"Verily this is a Reward for you, and your Endeavour is accepted and recognised."
It is We Who have sent down the Qur'an to thee by stages.
Therefore be patient with constancy to the Command of thy Lord, and hearken not to the sinner or the ingrate among them.
And celebrate the name or thy Lord morning and evening,
And part of the night, prostrate thyself to Him; and glorify Him a long night through.
As to these, they love the fleeting life, and put away behind them a Day (that will be) hard.
It is We Who created them, and We have made their joints strong; but, when We will, We can substitute the like of them by a complete change.
This is an admonition: Whosoever will, let him take a (straight) Path to his Lord.
But ye will not, except as God wills; for God is full of Knowledge and Wisdom.
He will admit to His Mercy whom He will; But the wrong-doers,- for them has He prepared a grievous Penalty.
By the (Winds) sent forth one after another (to man's profit);
Which then blow violently in tempestuous Gusts,
And scatter (things) far and wide;
Then separate them, one from another,
Then spread abroad a Message,
Whether of Justification or of Warning;-
Assuredly, what ye are promised must come to pass.
Then when the stars become dim;
When the heaven is cleft asunder;
When the mountains are scattered (to the winds) as dust;
And when the apostles are (all) appointed a time (to collect);-
For what Day are these (portents) deferred?
For the Day of Sorting out.
And what will explain to thee what is the Day of Sorting out?
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
Did We not destroy the men of old (for their evil)?
So shall We make later (generations) follow them.
Thus do We deal with men of sin.
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
Have We not created you from a fluid (held) despicable?-
The which We placed in a place of rest, firmly fixed,
For a period (of gestation), determined (according to need)?
For We do determine (according to need); for We are the best to determine (things).
Ah woe, that Day! to the Rejecters of Truth!
Have We not made the earth (as a place) to draw together.
The living and the dead,
And made therein mountains standing firm, lofty (in stature); and provided for you water sweet (and wholesome)?
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
(It will be said:) "Depart ye to that which ye used to reject as false!
"Depart ye to a Shadow (of smoke ascending) in three columns,
"(Which yields) no shade of coolness, and is of no use against the fierce Blaze.
"Indeed it throws about sparks (huge) as Forts,
"As if there were (a string of) yellow camels (marching swiftly)."
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
That will be a Day when they shall not be able to speak.
Nor will it be open to them to put forth pleas.
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
That will be a Day of Sorting out! We shall gather you together and those before (you)!
Now, if ye have a trick (or plot), use it against Me!
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
As to the Righteous, they shall be amidst (cool) shades and springs (of water).
And (they shall have) fruits,- all they desire.
"Eat ye and drink ye to your heart's content: for that ye worked (Righteousness).
Thus do We certainly reward the Doers of Good.
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
(O ye unjust!) Eat ye and enjoy yourselves (but) a little while, for that ye are Sinners.
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
And when it is said to them, "Prostrate yourselves!" they do not so.
Ah woe, that Day, to the Rejecters of Truth!
Then what Message, after that, will they believe in?
Concerning what are they disputing?
Concerning the Great News,
About which they cannot agree.
Verily, they shall soon (come to) know!
Verily, verily they shall soon (come to) know!
Have We not made the earth as a wide expanse,
And the mountains as pegs?
And (have We not) created you in pairs,
And made your sleep for rest,
And made the night as a covering,
And made the day as a means of subsistence?
And (have We not) built over you the seven firmaments,
And placed (therein) a Light of Splendour?
And do We not send down from the clouds water in abundance,
That We may produce therewith corn and vegetables,
And gardens of luxurious growth?
Verily the Day of Sorting out is a thing appointed,
The Day that the Trumpet shall be sounded, and ye shall come forth in crowds;
And the heavens shall be opened as if there were doors,
And the mountains shall vanish, as if they were a mirage.
Truly Hell is as a place of ambush,
For the transgressors a place of destination:
They will dwell therein for ages.
Nothing cool shall they taste therein, nor any drink,
Save a boiling fluid and a fluid, dark, murky, intensely cold,
A fitting recompense (for them).
For that they used not to fear any account (for their deeds),
But they (impudently) treated Our Signs as false.
And all things have We preserved on record.
"So taste ye (the fruits of your deeds); for no increase shall We grant you, except in Punishment."
Verily for the Righteous there will be a fulfilment of (the heart's) desires;
Gardens enclosed, and grapevines;
Companions of equal age;
And a cup full (to the brim).
No vanity shall they hear therein, nor Untruth:-
Recompense from thy Lord, a gift, (amply) sufficient,
(From) the Lord of the heavens and the earth, and all between, (God) Most Gracious: None shall have power to argue with Him.
The Day that the Spirit and the angels will stand forth in ranks, none shall speak except any who is permitted by (God) Most Gracious, and He will say what is right.
That Day will be the sure Reality: Therefore, whoso will, let him take a (straight) return to his Lord!
Verily, We have warned you of a Penalty near, the Day when man will see (the deeds) which his hands have sent forth, and the Unbeliever will say, "Woe unto me! Would that I were (metre) dust!"
By the (angels) who tear out (the souls of the wicked) with violence;
By those who gently draw out (the souls of the blessed);
And by those who glide along (on errands of mercy),
Then press forward as in a race,
Then arrange to do (the Commands of their Lord),
One Day everything that can be in commotion will be in violent commotion,
Followed by oft-repeated (commotions):
Hearts that Day will be in agitation;
Cast down will be (their owners') eyes.
They say (now): "What! shall we indeed be returned to (our) former state?
"What! - when we shall have become rotten bones?"
They say: "It would, in that case, be a return with loss!"
But verily, it will be but a single (Compelling) Cry,
When, behold, they will be in the (full) awakening (to Judgment).
Has the story of Moses reached thee?
Behold, thy Lord did call to him in the sacred valley of Tuwa:-
"Go thou to Pharaoh for he has indeed transgressed all bounds:
"And say to him, 'Wouldst thou that thou shouldst be purified (from sin)?-
"'And that I guide thee to thy Lord, so thou shouldst fear Him?'"
Then did (Moses) show him the Great Sign.
But (Pharaoh) rejected it and disobeyed (guidance);
Further, he turned his back, striving hard (against God).
Then he collected (his men) and made a proclamation,
Saying, "I am your Lord, Most High".
But God did punish him, (and made an) example of him, - in the Hereafter, as in this life.
Verily in this is an instructive warning for whosoever feareth (God).
What! Are ye the more difficult to create or the heaven (above)? (God) hath constructed it:
On high hath He raised its canopy, and He hath given it order and perfection.
Its night doth He endow with darkness, and its splendour doth He bring out (with light).
And the earth, moreover, hath He extended (to a wide expanse);
He draweth out therefrom its moisture and its pasture;
And the mountains hath He firmly fixed;-
For use and convenience to you and your cattle.
Therefore, when there comes the great, overwhelming (Event),-
The Day when man shall remember (all) that he strove for,
And Hell-Fire shall be placed in full view for (all) to see,-
Then, for such as had transgressed all bounds,
And had preferred the life of this world,
The Abode will be Hell-Fire;
And for such as had entertained the fear of standing before their Lord's (tribunal) and had restrained (their) soul from lower desires,
Their abode will be the Garden.
They ask thee about the Hour,-'When will be its appointed time?
Wherein art thou (concerned) with the declaration thereof?
With thy Lord in the Limit fixed therefor.
Thou art but a Warner for such as fear it.
The Day they see it, (It will be) as if they had tarried but a single evening, or (at most till) the following morn!
(The Prophet) frowned and turned away,
Because there came to him the blind man (interrupting).
But what could tell thee but that perchance he might grow (in spiritual understanding)?-
Or that he might receive admonition, and the teaching might profit him?
As to one who regards Himself as self-sufficient,
To him dost thou attend;
Though it is no blame to thee if he grow not (in spiritual understanding).
But as to him who came to thee striving earnestly,
And with fear (in his heart),
Of him wast thou unmindful.
By no means (should it be so)! For it is indeed a Message of instruction:
Therefore let whoso will, keep it in remembrance.
(It is) in Books held (greatly) in honour,
Exalted (in dignity), kept pure and holy,
(Written) by the hands of scribes-
Honourable and Pious and Just.
Woe to man! What hath made him reject God;
From what stuff hath He created him?
From a sperm-drop: He hath created him, and then mouldeth him in due proportions;
Then doth He make His path smooth for him;
Then He causeth him to die, and putteth him in his grave;
Then, when it is His Will, He will raise him up (again).
By no means hath he fulfilled what God hath commanded him.
Then let man look at his food, (and how We provide it):
For that We pour forth water in abundance,
And We split the earth in fragments,
And produce therein corn,
And Grapes and nutritious plants,
And Olives and Dates,
And enclosed Gardens, dense with lofty trees,
And fruits and fodder,-
For use and convenience to you and your cattle.
At length, when there comes the Deafening Noise,-
That Day shall a man flee from his own brother,
And from his mother and his father,
And from his wife and his children.
Each one of them, that Day, will have enough concern (of his own) to make him indifferent to the others.
Some faces that Day will be beaming,
Laughing, rejoicing.
And other faces that Day will be dust-stained,
Blackness will cover them:
Such will be the Rejecters of God, the doers of iniquity.
When the sun (with its spacious light) is folded up;
When the stars fall, losing their lustre;
When the mountains vanish (like a mirage);
When the she-camels, ten months with young, are left untended;
When the wild beasts are herded together (in the human habitations);
When the oceans boil over with a swell;
When the souls are sorted out, (being joined, like with like);
When the female (infant), buried alive, is questioned -
For what crime she was killed;
When the scrolls are laid open;
When the world on High is unveiled;
When the Blazing Fire is kindled to fierce heat;
And when the Garden is brought near;-
(Then) shall each soul know what it has put forward.
So verily I call to witness the planets - that recede,
Go straight, or hide;
And the Night as it dissipates;
And the Dawn as it breathes away the darkness;-
Verily this is the word of a most honourable Messenger,
Endued with Power, with rank before the Lord of the Throne,
With authority there, (and) faithful to his trust.
And (O people!) your companion is not one possessed;
And without doubt he saw him in the clear horizon.
Neither doth he withhold grudgingly a knowledge of the Unseen.
Nor is it the word of an evil spirit accursed.
When whither go ye?
Verily this is no less than a Message to (all) the Worlds:
(With profit) to whoever among you wills to go straight:
But ye shall not will except as God wills,- the Cherisher of the Worlds.
When the Sky is cleft asunder;
When the Stars are scattered;
When the Oceans are suffered to burst forth;
And when the Graves are turned upside down;-
(Then) shall each soul know what it hath sent forward and (what it hath) kept back.
O man! What has seduced thee from thy Lord Most Beneficent?-
Him Who created thee. Fashioned thee in due proportion, and gave thee a just bias;
In whatever Form He wills, does He put thee together.
Day! nit ye do reject Right and Judgment!
But verily over you (are appointed angels) to protect you,-
Kind and honourable,- Writing down (your deeds):
They know (and understand) all that ye do.
As for the Righteous, they will be in bliss;
And the Wicked - they will be in the Fire,
Which they will enter on the Day of Judgment,
And they will not be able to keep away therefrom.
And what will explain to thee what the Day of Judgment is?
Again, what will explain to thee what the Day of Judgment is?
(It will be) the Day when no soul shall have power (to do) aught for another: For the command, that Day, will be (wholly) with God.
Woe to those that deal in fraud,-
Those who, when they have to receive by measure from men, exact full measure,
But when they have to give by measure or weight to men, give less than due.
Do they not think that they will be called to account?-
On a Mighty Day,
A Day when (all) mankind will stand before the Lord of the Worlds?
Day! Surely the record of the wicked is (preserved) in Sijjin.
And what will explain to thee what Sijjin is?
(There is) a Register (fully) inscribed.
Woe, that Day, to those that deny-
Those that deny the Day of Judgment.
And none can deny it but the Transgressor beyond bounds the Sinner!
When Our Signs are rehearsed to him, he says, "Tales of the ancients!"
By no means! but on their hearts is the stain of the (ill) which they do!
Verily, from (the Light of) their Lord, that Day, will they be veiled.
Further, they will enter the Fire of Hell.
Further, it will be said to them: "This is the (reality) which ye rejected as false!
Day, verily the record of the Righteous is (preserved) in 'Illiyin.
And what will explain to thee what 'Illiyun is?
(There is) a Register (fully) inscribed,
To which bear witness those Nearest (to God).
Truly the Righteous will be in Bliss:
On Thrones (of Dignity) will they command a sight (of all things):
Thou wilt recognise in their faces the beaming brightness of Bliss.
Their thirst will be slaked with Pure Wine sealed:
The seal thereof will be Musk: And for this let those aspire, who have aspirations:
With it will be (given) a mixture of Tasnim:
A spring, from (the waters) whereof drink those Nearest to God.
Those in sin used to laugh at those who believed,
And whenever they passed by them, used to wink at each other (in mockery);
And when they returned to their own people, they would return jesting;
And whenever they saw them, they would say, "Behold! These are the people truly astray!"
But they had not been sent as keepers over them!
But on this Day the Believers will laugh at the Unbelievers:
On Thrones (of Dignity) they will command (a sight) (of all things).
Will not the Unbelievers have been paid back for what they did?
When the sky is rent asunder,
And hearkens to (the Command of) its Lord, and it must needs (do so);-
And when the earth is flattened out,
And casts forth what is within it and becomes (clean) empty,
And hearkens to (the Command of) its Lord,- and it must needs (do so);- (then will come Home the full reality).
O thou man! Verily thou art ever toiling on towards thy Lord- painfully toiling,- but thou shalt meet Him.
Then he who is given his Record in his right hand,
Soon will his account be taken by an easy reckoning,
And he will turn to his people, rejoicing!
But he who is given his Record behind his back,-
Soon will he cry for perdition,
And he will enter a Blazing Fire.
Truly, did he go about among his people, rejoicing!
Truly, did he think that he would not have to return (to Us)!
Nay, nay! for his Lord was (ever) watchful of him!
So I do call to witness the ruddy glow of Sunset;
The Night and its Homing;
And the Moon in her fullness:
Ye shall surely travel from stage to stage.
What then is the matter with them, that they believe not?-
And when the Qur'an is read to them, they fall not prostrate,
But on the contrary the Unbelievers reject (it).
But God has full knowledge of what they secrete (in their breasts)
So announce to them a Penalty Grievous,
Except to those who believe and work righteous deeds: For them is a Reward that will never fail.
By the sky, (displaying) the Zodiacal Signs;
By the promised Day (of Judgment);
By one that witnesses, and the subject of the witness;-
Woe to the makers of the pit (of fire),
Fire supplied (abundantly) with fuel:
Behold! they sat over against the (fire),
And they witnessed (all) that they were doing against the Believers.
And they ill-treated them for no other reason than that they believed in God, Exalted in Power, Worthy of all Praise!-
Him to Whom belongs the dominion of the heavens and the earth! And God is Witness to all things.
Those who persecute (or draw into temptation) the Believers, men and women, and do not turn in repentance, will have the Penalty of Hell: They will have the Penalty of the Burning Fire.
For those who believe and do righteous deeds, will be Gardens; beneath which rivers flow: That is the great Salvation, (the fulfilment of all desires),
Truly strong is the Grip (and Power) of thy Lord.
It is He Who creates from the very beginning, and He can restore (life).
And He is the Oft-Forgiving, Full of Loving-Kindness,
Lord of the Throne of Glory,
Doer (without let) of all that He intends.
Has the story reached thee, of the forces-
Of Pharaoh and the Thamud?
And yet the Unbelievers (persist) in rejecting (the Truth)!
But God doth encompass them from behind!
Day, this is a Glorious Qur'an,
(Inscribed) in a Tablet Preserved!
By the Sky and the Night-Visitant (therein);-
And what will explain to thee what the Night-Visitant is?-
(It is) the Star of piercing brightness;-
There is no soul but has a protector over it.
Now let man but think from what he is created!
He is created from a drop emitted-
Proceeding from between the backbone and the ribs:
Surely (God) is able to bring him back (to life)!
The Day that (all) things secret will be tested,
(Man) will have no power, and no helper.
By the Firmament which returns (in its round),
And by the Earth which opens out (for the gushing of springs or the sprouting of vegetation),-
Behold this is the Word that distinguishes (Good from Evil):
It is not a thing for amusement.
As for them, they are but plotting a scheme,
And I am planning a scheme.
Therefore grant a delay to the Unbelievers: Give respite to them gently (for awhile).
Glorify the name of thy Guardian-Lord Most High,
Who hath created, and further, given order and proportion;
Who hath ordained laws. And granted guidance;
And Who bringeth out the (green and luscious) pasture,
And then doth make it (but) swarthy stubble.
By degrees shall We teach thee to declare (the Message), so thou shalt not forget,
Except as God wills: For He knoweth what is manifest and what is hidden.
And We will make it easy for thee (to follow) the simple (Path).
Therefore give admonition in case the admonition profits (the hearer).
The admonition will be received by those who fear (God):
But it will be avoided by those most unfortunate ones,
Who will enter the Great Fire,
In which they will then neither die nor live.
But those will prosper who purify themselves,
And glorify the name of their Guardian-Lord, and (lift their hearts) in prayer.
Day (behold), ye prefer the life of this world;
But the Hereafter is better and more enduring.
And this is in the Books of the earliest (Revelation),-
The Books of Abraham and Moses.
Has the story reached thee of the overwhelming (Event)?
Some faces, that Day, will be humiliated,
Labouring (hard), weary,-
The while they enter the Blazing Fire,-
The while they are given, to drink, of a boiling hot spring,
No food will there be for them but a bitter Dhari'
Which will neither nourish nor satisfy hunger.
(Other) faces that Day will be joyful,
Pleased with their striving,-
In a Garden on high,
Where they shall hear no (word) of vanity:
Therein will be a bubbling spring:
Therein will be Thrones (of dignity), raised on high,
Goblets placed (ready),
And cushions set in rows,
And rich carpets (all) spread out.
Do they not look at the Camels, how they are made?-
And at the Sky, how it is raised high?-
And at the Mountains, how they are fixed firm?-
And at the Earth, how it is spread out?
Therefore do thou give admonition, for thou art one to admonish.
Thou art not one to manage (men's) affairs.
But if any turn away and reject God,-
God will punish him with a mighty Punishment,
For to Us will be their return;
Then it will be for Us to call them to account.
By the break of Day
By the Nights twice five;
By the even and odd (contrasted);
And by the Night when it passeth away;-
Is there (not) in these an adjuration (or evidence) for those who understand?
Seest thou not how thy Lord dealt with the 'Ad (people),-
Of the (city of) Iram, with lofty pillars,
The like of which were not produced in (all) the land?
And with the Thamud (people), who cut out (huge) rocks in the valley?-
And with Pharaoh, lord of stakes?
(All) these transgressed beyond bounds in the lands,
And heaped therein mischief (on mischief).
Therefore did thy Lord pour on them a scourge of diverse chastisements:
For thy Lord is (as a Guardian) on a watch-tower.
Now, as for man, when his Lord trieth him, giving him honour and gifts, then saith he, (puffed up), "My Lord hath honoured me."
But when He trieth him, restricting his subsistence for him, then saith he (in despair), "My Lord hath humiliated me!"
Nay, nay! but ye honour not the orphans!
Nor do ye encourage one another to feed the poor!-
And ye devour inheritance - all with greed,
And ye love wealth with inordinate love!
Nay! When the earth is pounded to powder,
And thy Lord cometh, and His angels, rank upon rank,
And Hell, that Day, is brought (face to face),- on that Day will man remember, but how will that remembrance profit him?
He will say: "Ah! Would that I had sent forth (good deeds) for (this) my (Future) Life!"
For, that Day, His Chastisement will be such as none (else) can inflict,
And His bonds will be such as none (other) can bind.
(To the righteous soul will be said:) "O (thou) soul, in (complete) rest and satisfaction!
"Come back thou to thy Lord,- well pleased (thyself), and well-pleasing unto Him!
"Enter thou, then, among My devotees!
"Yea, enter thou My Heaven!
I do call to witness this City;-
And thou art a freeman of this City;-
And (the mystic ties of) parent and child;-
Verily We have created man into toil and struggle.
Thinketh he, that none hath power over him?
He may say (boastfully); Wealth have I squandered in abundance!
Thinketh he that none beholdeth him?
Have We not made for him a pair of eyes?-
And a tongue, and a pair of lips?-
And shown him the two highways?
But he hath made no haste on the path that is steep.
And what will explain to thee the path that is steep?-
(It is:) freeing the bondman;
Or the giving of food in a day of privation
To the orphan with claims of relationship,
Or to the indigent (down) in the dust.
Then will he be of those who believe, and enjoin patience, (constancy, and self-restraint), and enjoin deeds of kindness and compassion.
Such are the Companions of the Right Hand.
But those who reject Our Signs, they are the (unhappy) Companions of the Left Hand.
On them will be Fire vaulted over (all round).
By the Sun and his (glorious) splendour;
By the Moon as she follows him;
By the Day as it shows up (the Sun's) glory;
By the Night as it conceals it;
By the Firmament and its (wonderful) structure;
By the Earth and its (wide) expanse:
By the Soul, and the proportion and order given to it;
And its enlightenment as to its wrong and its right;-
Truly he succeeds that purifies it,
And he fails that corrupts it!
The Thamud (people) rejected (their prophet) through their inordinate wrong-doing,
Behold, the most wicked man among them was deputed (for impiety).
But the Apostle of God said to them: "It is a She-camel of God! And (bar her not from) having her drink!"
Then they rejected him (as a false prophet), and they hamstrung her. So their Lord, on account of their crime, obliterated their traces and made them equal (in destruction, high and low)!
And for Him is no fear of its consequences.
By the Night as it conceals (the light);
By the Day as it appears in glory;
By (the mystery of) the creation of male and female;-
Verily, (the ends) ye strive for are diverse.
So he who gives (in charity) and fears (God),
And (in all sincerity) testifies to the best,-
We will indeed make smooth for him the path to Bliss.
But he who is a greedy miser and thinks himself self-sufficient,
And gives the lie to the best,-
We will indeed make smooth for him the path to Misery;
Nor will his wealth profit him when he falls headlong (into the Pit).
Verily We take upon Ourselves to guide,
And verily unto Us (belong) the End and the Beginning.
Therefore do I warn you of a Fire blazing fiercely;
None shall reach it but those most unfortunate ones
Who give the lie to Truth and turn their backs.
But those most devoted to God shall be removed far from it,-
Those who spend their wealth for increase in self-purification,
And have in their minds no favour from anyone for which a reward is expected in return,
But only the desire to seek for the Countenance of their Lord Most High;
And soon will they attain (complete) satisfaction.
By the Glorious Morning Light,
And by the Night when it is still,-
Thy Guardian-Lord hath not forsaken thee, nor is He displeased.
And verily the Hereafter will be better for thee than the present.
And soon will thy Guardian-Lord give thee (that wherewith) thou shalt be well-pleased.
Did He not find thee an orphan and give thee shelter (and care)?
And He found thee wandering, and He gave thee guidance.
And He found thee in need, and made thee independent.
Therefore, treat not the orphan with harshness,
Nor repulse the petitioner (unheard);
But the bounty of the Lord - rehearse and proclaim!
Have We not expanded thee thy breast?-
And removed from thee thy burden
The which did gall thy back?-
And raised high the esteem (in which) thou (art held)?
So, verily, with every difficulty, there is relief:
Verily, with every difficulty there is relief.
Therefore, when thou art free (from thine immediate task), still labour hard,
And to thy Lord turn (all) thy attention.
By the Fig and the Olive,
And the Mount of Sinai,
And this City of security,-
We have indeed created man in the best of moulds,
Then do We abase him (to be) the lowest of the low,-
Except such as believe and do righteous deeds: For they shall have a reward unfailing.
Then what can, after this, contradict thee, as to the judgment (to come)?
Is not God the wisest of judges?
Proclaim! (or read!) in the name of thy Lord and Cherisher, Who created-
Created man, out of a (mere) clot of congealed blood:
Proclaim! And thy Lord is Most Bountiful,-
He Who taught (the use of) the pen,-
Taught man that which he knew not.
Day, but man doth transgress all bounds,
In that he looketh upon himself as self-sufficient.
Verily, to thy Lord is the return (of all).
Seest thou one who forbids-
A votary when he (turns) to pray?
Seest thou if he is on (the road of) Guidance?-
Or enjoins Righteousness?
Seest thou if he denies (Truth) and turns away?
Knoweth he not that God doth see?
Let him beware! If he desist not, We will drag him by the forelock,-
A lying, sinful forelock!
Then, let him call (for help) to his council (of comrades):
We will call on the angels of punishment (to deal with him)!
Day, heed him not: But bow down in adoration, and bring thyself the closer (to God)!
We have indeed revealed this (Message) in the Night of Power:
And what will explain to thee what the night of power is?
The Night of Power is better than a thousand months.
Therein come down the angels and the Spirit by God's permission, on every errand:
Peace!...This until the rise of morn!
Those who reject (Truth), among the People of the Book and among the Polytheists, were not going to depart (from their ways) until there should come to them Clear Evidence,-
An apostle from God, rehearsing scriptures kept pure and holy:
Wherein are laws (or decrees) right and straight.
Nor did the People of the Book make schisms, until after there came to them Clear Evidence.
And they have been commanded no more than this: To worship God, offering Him sincere devotion, being true (in faith); to establish regular prayer; and to practise regular charity; and that is the Religion Right and Straight.
Those who reject (Truth), among the People of the Book and among the Polytheists, will be in Hell-Fire, to dwell therein (for aye). They are the worst of creatures.
Those who have faith and do righteous deeds,- they are the best of creatures.
Their reward is with God: Gardens of Eternity, beneath which rivers flow; they will dwell therein for ever; God well pleased with them, and they with Him: all this for such as fear their Lord and Cherisher.
When the earth is shaken to her (utmost) convulsion,
And the earth throws up her burdens (from within),
And man cries (distressed): 'What is the matter with her?'-
On that Day will she declare her tidings:
For that thy Lord will have given her inspiration.
On that Day will men proceed in companies sorted out, to be shown the deeds that they (had done).
Then shall anyone who has done an atom's weight of good, see it!
And anyone who has done an atom's weight of evil, shall see it.
By the (Steeds) that run, with panting (breath),
And strike sparks of fire,
And push home the charge in the morning,
And raise the dust in clouds the while,
And penetrate forthwith into the midst (of the foe) en masse;-
Truly man is, to his Lord, ungrateful;
And to that (fact) he bears witness (by his deeds);
And violent is he in his love of wealth.
Does he not know,- when that which is in the graves is scattered abroad
And that which is (locked up) in (human) breasts is made manifest-
That their Lord had been Well-acquainted with them, (even to) that Day.?
The (Day) of Noise and Clamour:
What is the (Day) of Noise and Clamour?
And what will explain to thee what the (Day) of Noise and Clamour is?
(It is) a Day whereon men will be like moths scattered about,
And the mountains will be like carded wool.
Then, he whose balance (of good deeds) will be (found) heavy,
Will be in a life of good pleasure and satisfaction.
But he whose balance (of good deeds) will be (found) light,-
Will have his home in a (bottomless) Pit.
And what will explain to thee what this is?
(It is) a Fire Blazing fiercely!
The mutual rivalry for piling up (the good things of this world) diverts you (from the more serious things),
Until ye visit the graves.
But nay, ye soon shall know (the reality).
Again, ye soon shall know!
Nay, were ye to know with certainty of mind, (ye would beware!)
Ye shall certainly see Hell-Fire!
Again, ye shall see it with certainty of sight!
Then, shall ye be questioned that Day about the joy (ye indulged in!).
By (the Token of) Time (through the ages),
Verily Man is in loss,
Except such as have Faith, and do righteous deeds, and (join together) in the mutual teaching of Truth, and of Patience and Constancy.
Woe to every (kind of) scandal-monger and-backbiter,
Who pileth up wealth and layeth it by,
Thinking that his wealth would make him last for ever!
By no means! He will be sure to be thrown into That which Breaks to Pieces,
And what will explain to thee That which Breaks to Pieces?
(It is) the Fire of (the Wrath of) God kindled (to a blaze),
The which doth mount (Right) to the Hearts:
It shall be made into a vault over them,
In columns outstretched.
Seest thou not how thy Lord dealt with the Companions of the Elephant?
Did He not make their treacherous plan go astray?
And He sent against them Flights of Birds,
Striking them with stones of baked clay.
Then did He make them like an empty field of stalks and straw, (of which the corn) has been eaten up.
For the covenants (of security and safeguard enjoyed) by the Quraish,
Their covenants (covering) journeys by winter and summer,-
Let them adore the Lord of this House,
Who provides them with food against hunger, and with security against fear (of danger).
Seest thou one who denies the Judgment (to come)?
Then such is the (man) who repulses the orphan (with harshness),
And encourages not the feeding of the indigent.
So woe to the worshippers
Who are neglectful of their prayers,
Those who (want but) to be seen (of men),
But refuse (to supply) (even) neighbourly needs.
To thee have We granted the Fount (of Abundance).
Therefore to thy Lord turn in Prayer and Sacrifice.
For he who hateth thee, he will be cut off (from Future Hope).
Say : O ye that reject Faith!
I worship not that which ye worship,
Nor will ye worship that which I worship.
And I will not worship that which ye have been wont to worship,
Nor will ye worship that which I worship.
To you be your Way, and to me mine.
When comes the Help of God, and Victory,
And thou dost see the people enter God's Religion in crowds,
Celebrate the praises of thy Lord, and pray for His Forgiveness: For He is Oft-Returning (in Grace and Mercy).
Perish the hands of the Father of Flame! Perish he!
No profit to him from all his wealth, and all his gains!
Burnt soon will he be in a Fire of Blazing Flame!
His wife shall carry the (crackling) wood - As fuel!-
A twisted rope of palm-leaf fibre round her (own) neck!
Say: He is God, the One and Only;
God, the Eternal, Absolute;
He begetteth not, nor is He begotten;
And there is none like unto Him.
Say: I seek refuge with the Lord of the Dawn
From the mischief of created things;
From the mischief of Darkness as it overspreads;
From the mischief of those who practise secret arts;
And from the mischief of the envious one as he practises envy.
Say: I seek refuge with the Lord and Cherisher of Mankind,
The King (or Ruler) of Mankind,
The God (for judge) of Mankind,-
From the mischief of the Whisperer (of Evil), who withdraws (after his whisper),-
(The same) who whispers into the hearts of Mankind,-
Among Jinns and among men.
